Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Book: "Last Dash to the South" by Vladimir </F>
Zhirinovskiy; "Pisatel" Limited Liability Company and "Bukvitsa" 
Publishing Cooperative, 75,000 copies, 143 pages. COPYRIGHT: 
Zhirinovskiy V.V.] 
  [Text] Vladimir Volfovich Zhirinovskiy, the widely known 
politician, was born 25 April 1946 in the city of Alma-Ata 
[Almaty] in a family belonging to the intelligentsia. He 
graduated from the Institute of Asian and African Countries at 
the Moscow State University named for M.V. Lomonosov and the 
Moscow State University law faculty. He is a specialist on 
problems of Central Asia, the Transcaucasus, and the Near East. 
He is fluent in English, French, German, and Turkish. He 
served as a staff officer in the Transcaucasus Military District 
and headed the "Mir" Publishing House legal service. In 1990 he 
set up and became head of the Liberal Democratic Party; he is a 
politician of the modern mold and advocates a natural historical 
path of development and the preservation of Russia's territorial 
integrity. He is dynamic, has great political astuteness, and 
he is a magnificent polemicist and speaker. In his public 
activity he looks toward satisfying the people's vital 
interests. In 1991 he ran for president of the RSFSR and won 
almost one-tenth of Russian voters' votes. He is married with a 
son. 
  1. My disadvantaged personal life helped make me a 
good student. I tried to find some sort of satisfaction from 
this.... 
  2. I am in favor of the broadest development -- the 
most important thing is that there be no enmity, no dominance by 
any one nation, no discrimination. 
  3. The last dash to the south, Russia's outlet to the 
shores of the Indian Ocean and Mediterranean Ocean is really the 
task of saving the Russian nation. 
  4. You cannot govern by waving chocolate bars in the 
face of your subjects, or only by brandishing a whip.... 
  5. It is undesirable to tie everybody to one party, to 
one idea, to one blueprint. That is deadening. While a 
multitude of ideas makes the country more luxuriant, like a 
bouquet of flowers. 
  6. So let's have less heroism.... If we all sacrifice 
ourselves, who then is going to live in our country? 
  7. This will be a new Russia, without "devils," 
without fanaticism, a Russia where Orthodoxy and the Christian 
religion hold a dominant position. 
  8. Russians, proud people, the 21st century will 
belong to us despite everything! 
  This is an analytical narrative mixed with a 
biographical outline, the encapsulation of my philosophical and 
geopolitical views on present-day reality. It is the juice of 
my brain, the point I have reached during my 46 years. 
  So I will begin right at the beginning. I am Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy. I have a Russian name -- Vladimir -- but my 
father's name was Volf; that is what his birth certificate and 
passport said. Mom used to call him simply Volodya, and it 
would have been simpler for me to have been called Vladimir 
Vladimirovich, but whether because of bureaucracy or red tape, I 
don't know, but one way or another I am Vladimir Volfovich. I'm 
proud of either name because it was my father's, although it 
sounds rather odd to Russian ears. 
  I was born 25 April 1946 in Alma-Ata. It was 11 on a 
Thursday evening. Rain was falling. It was the first spring 
after the war. We lived in a two-story house on Dunganskaya 
Street in a city that had once been called Vernyy and was 
founded by Russian Cossacks in 1854. Russian people founded 
this city. So I am always entitled to consider that I was born 
in Russia among Russians. It was later that first the Kazakh 
ASSR [Autonomous Soviet Socialist Republic] and then the Kazakh 
SSR [Soviet Socialist Republic] would be created by edict of 
Stalin, and then in "CIS" times even the independent state of 
Kazakhstan. As though Russians are merely fertilizer for the 
ground on which states belonging to someone else are to emerge 
and Russians themselves do not need their own state. For some 
reason Russians are not supposed to have their own state where 
they were born, where they live, where their forebears died, and 
where they founded cities -- by rights, not as conquerors, for 
there was no state there when the Russian Cossacks arrived. 
There was their stanitsa [Cossack village] on the bank of the 
Alma-Atinka River. A small stanitsa inhabited by Cossacks. 
There was no aul [Kazakh village] nearby. Unfortunately the 
Russian words kazak [Cossack] and kazakh [Kazakh] -- the name of 
the local indigenous population -- sound very similar. 
  I was born in a two-story house where only Russians lived, 
and the whole city was largely Russian -- to this day 80 percent 
of the population are Russians. So I have always considered 
myself Russian, being born of a Russian woman, Aleksandra 
Pavlovna Zhirinovskaya, nee Makarova, whose mother, my 
grandmother, was Fiona Nikiforovna Makarova, nee Sergucheva. 
She had a brother called Mikhail Nikiforovich. And also 
another brother. One worked in Moscow at the State Mint. My 
grandmother herself worked in Moscow, in the Botanical Garden, 
during the thirties. Fate scattered my relatives throughout the 
country. They have lived all over the place! Moscow, 
Leningrad, Penza, Syzran, Sasovo, Kemerovo, Bratsk, Arkhangelsk, 
Ulyanovsk, Pyatigorsk, Gomel, the Far East, Armavir in Krasnodar 
Kray, Sakhalin, Frunze, Dushanbe -- all over the country. And 
also in Ukraine, the Caucasus, and Maykop, because my mother had 
two brothers and two sisters, there were five children in the 
family. And they all had children, and they all got married. 
If you assembled the whole family there would probably be about 
100 people. Naturally, there were people of various 
nationalities. There was a cleaner and a candidate of sciences 
in our family. An ordinary soldier and a colonel. People who 
had graduated from higher educational institutions and people 
who had failed to graduate. It was a typical average Russian 
family. A multinational family. The husbands of several 
cousins were non-Russians. My aunt's husband was a Mordvinian, 
Viktor Izmaylov. My cousin Rena's husband was an Ossetian or an 
Adygean. So we were a bit of a mix. But all the same, we were 
mostly Russians. My grandfather Pavel Ivanovich Makarov died of 
typhus in 1919; he was a soldier in the old czarist Russian 
army. I, his grandson, cannot say today which side he was on -- 
the Reds' or the Whites'. Judging by his last photograph he was 
a soldier in the czarist army. But he may have made his choice 
before October 1917. I do not know whose side he was on after 
October 1917. Today we cannot accuse each other of anything. 
How can we assess the events of the start of the century when 
today, though we are eyewitnesses and participants in modern 
history, we cannot always make a correct assessment of 
particular events?... 
  I was born right there in the apartment, in the very room 
where I spent the next 18 years until the day, 3 July 1964, I 
left my native city of Alma-Ata forever and moved to Moscow. 
The ambulance did not manage to reach Mom in time, so they went 
to fetch a neighbor, a pensioner and midwife. It was raining 
and she lived some way away, so she too did not arrive in time. 
Our neighbors were relations. My uncle, my aunt's husband, 
helped my mother and cut the cord with a kitchen knife. He did 
a good job, no worse than they do in maternity homes. 
Eventually the ambulance arrived, and Mom and I were taken off 
to a maternity home. Maybe this moment of birth also had some 
kind of effect on my future fate? Maybe I myself provoked it 
somehow? I could not wait. I was the sixth child in the 
healthy body of my mother, where the entire childbearing 
machinery had been tried out by my siblings, three sisters and 
two brothers. 
  Despite Mom's half-starved life, I was clearly a strong boy 
and entered this world unaided. I was average weight, average 
size, and later I was to develop curly fair hair and blue eyes. 
My mother looked after me for three years and then, because of 
material circumstances, she was forced to get a job. My father, 
Volf Andreyevich Zhirinovskiy, was an ordinary legal adviser, 
worked at the Turkestan-Siberian Railroad Administration, and 
died early as a result of a car crash. Mom was left without a 
livelihood. We had a cow, but it had to be sold because there 
was no feed. Eventually Mom went to work in a cafeteria. That 
meant a better-fed and more secure existence. She would eat 
there and bring me something. From that time I was practically 
on state support. All my food came via the cafeteria. It was 
revolting food, of course, and it naturally wrecked my digestion 
and promoted the development of gastritis, cholecystitis, and so 
forth. But what could I, a small boy, do? I was always hungry. 
After school I would go to see Mom at work and wait until she 
managed to bring me something to eat. She did this on the sly, 
because it was against the rules. They were given meals at 
work, but this was extra. She would grovelingly beg the cook 
for a plate of soup and some rusty croquettes, and I would eat 
the lot and go home. Sometimes this would not happen. Mom would 
not be at work, or there would be some kind of problem. I would 
go hungry. So all my childhood memories are associated with the 
fact that I never had enough to eat. And the food was always 
monotonous and of poor quality. It was the same story with 
clothing. I never had decent good-quality clothes. I almost 
never had anything new, it was always somebody's old 
hand-me-downs. My clothes would be bought at the flea market -- 
from people who had grown out of them, or from dead people. At 
any rate, the clothes were old and secondhand and belonged to 
someone else. 
  One time, I remember, Mom had made me a bright check shirt 
out of scraps of material -- an overshirt, as the fashion was 
then, with little slits. I went with some boys to the park to 
bathe in the local pond, and when I got back to my clothes I 
could not find the shirt, someone had stolen it. Later somebody 
stole my satchel. I encountered social phenomena right from 
earliest childhood, from birth. The late arrival of the 
ambulance, then a hungry childhood and cold. The winters were 
relatively harsh, down to minus 20 degrees, but I had poor 
footwear, I never had warm boots or felt boots or decent 
clothes. I remember I used to go around in a sleeveless padded 
jacket. In some threadbare old overcoat given me by my cousin. 
  It was a joyless childhood. All 18 years. Maybe at 17 there 
were a few glimmers of light -- my first expectations, my first 
kisses.... But there is nothing to recall about home: I had no 
corner of my own. Even my bed was not my own. I slept on a 
trunk, and then on a sofa that everyone used to sit on, so that 
was not mine. At night, when nobody was sitting on it, I slept. 
I could not go quietly off to sleep because it was a room in a 
communal apartment. And there were sometimes up to five people 
in that room. Even if there were just three, the light would be 
on, the radio would be playing, and people would be wandering 
about. When I was small, very small, I wanted to go to bed 
earlier, at nine or ten, and I would always go to sleep while 
the light was on and there was noise all around. So even from 
childhood I felt somehow uncomfortable and unpleasant. I was 
deprived of the most basic family comfort and human warmth. 
  Mom never had any time, she was working. I was asleep when 
she left for work and had gone to bed when she got home. 
Sometimes I would not see her for days on end. Even on Sunday, 
the only day off -- Saturday became a day off only after I had 
left home -- on Sunday she would also be busy with something, 
she was always busy. There was the laundry to do, and on top of 
that it was a communal apartment. We were not allowed into the 
kitchen. Mom would cook meals on our kerosene stove, which 
stood in the corridor on top of a trunk. It used to take a long 
time, because there was just one stove and you had to cook the 
potatoes and also boil water for tea. The food was as basic as 
could be. Cabbage soup, sometimes borshch, and meat only on 
rare occasions. Kasha, or fried potatoes, and sometimes a bit 
of herring. There was never much meat or sausage. We would 
have sweets only on red-letter days, and even then only ordinary 
waffles or the cheapest chocolates at 1 ruble [R] 50 kopeks, 
"Domino" brand or sometimes some other kind. It was really hard 
living in a communal apartment. But at one time the entire 
apartment had belonged to us. My mother's first husband got it 
in 1940. He was a colonel. He, his wife, and five children 
were given the three-room apartment for the seven of them. But 
then the war began and they began to move other people in as 
well. First they took one room, then another. By the end of 
the war Mom was left with just one room. Mom's husband died of 
tuberculosis in 1944, and Mom married my father in 1945, then he 
died in 1946. So we stayed in that communal apartment with the 
right to just one room. Mom's sister lived next door. My 
father had asked her to move in with us: Better have relatives 
living there than families of outsiders and refugees. So Mom's 
sister and her family lived in the next room, and Mariya 
Nikolayevna, a refugee, lived in the third with her son. Mom's 
sister grabbed the entire kitchen in our three-room apartment, 
and Mom and our neighbor had to cook in the corridor. 
  I had absolutely nowhere to play -- either in the room or in 
the corridor. You always had to wait in line to use the toilet 
and it always stank, because a toilet always smells bad if there 
is no air freshener, especially when people use it one after 
another. If all 10 or 11 people use the toilet in the morning, 
then air fresheners are no use. Some people would smoke in 
there, which was also unpleasant. Mariya Nikolayevna used to 
smoke in the corridor while she was letting the smoke out of her 
room. From childhood I was surrounded by these poisonous puffs 
of tobacco smoke. The cigarettes were always the cheapest to be 
had, filterless "Prima" and suchlike. I was in everybody's way, 
I was the smallest. Then there was the "hazing" you get in a 
communal apartment -- people pick on the smallest person. They 
kick him and say rude things. Who will defend him? No brother, 
no father. And on top of everything else, there was my 
stepfather. In 1950 Mom decided she could not live on her own, 
she was only 38, she needed a man. She brought into the house a 
23-year-old student from the communications technical college. 
He was a stupid lad. But he was comfortable. He had a bed and 
food, he had his washing and mending done. What could he give 
us when he was a student at a technical college? His grant was 
not even enough for him, so not only was he no help to us, he 
was just an extra mouth in our poor family. And my mother was 
forced to feed him, herself, and me as well at the cafeteria. 
This was not always possible. When she had to choose between 
us, she chose him because he was her lover. They did not make 
it official, they did not go to the register office, although 
they could have done so; for some reason there was no particular 
need. My stepfather lived with us for 12 years. He caused us a 
lot of grief. Sometimes he would come home drunk, and he always 
used to smoke in the room. Now our room too was full of tobacco 
smoke. The room, the corridor, the toilet.... The small boy 
breathed this filth and fretted. I was badly fed and had almost 
no education. There was no opportunity for any contact with 
culture. Not only was there no children's corner, not only were 
there no toys. There was not a single children's book, we 
subscribed to no newspapers, there was no phone, there was 
nothing. I might as well have been living in a cave. I had a 
hankering for culture. I would open books for grown-ups. My 
mother loved reading Dreiser's "An American Tragedy" and "Queen 
Margot." I couldn't make much of them, I wanted to be reading 
children's books but I didn't have any. I wanted to be playing 
children's games, but there weren't any. Life itself seemed to 
force me to suffer from the day, from the moment, from the 
instant I was born. Society could offer me nothing. 
  Mom fixed me up at a 24-hour nursery. And from the age of 
two or three I was practically never home. I spent six days a 
week in a room with 26 beds and 12 little kids. I remember that 
nursery to this day, it was on Artilleriyskaya Street, the 
corner of Uzbekskaya Street, near the bathhouse. One time I had 
a great fright. We were asleep in our room when some drunk came 
up to our glass door -- we were on the ground floor -- tried to 
peer in, and knocked on the door. I was very frightened: My 
bed was right by the door. I also remember how we were fed 
cod-liver oil. We were supposed to go to the nurse and stand in 
line, and she would pour cod-liver oil into our mouths using the 
same tablespoon and the same bottle. For some reason many 
children did not like it -- it was even regarded as a kind of 
punishment to have to take it. But at the time it was thought 
to be good for children, so we were given cod-liver oil. I 
remember how we were wakened at 11 in the evening. We were put 
to bed at 9, then wakened at 11 so we could urinate into a 
bucket. Some of us could not get through the night and would 
wet the bed. And the nursery staff, in order to avoid having to 
change the linen and dry the sheets, would use the following 
method: They would wake the whole group, put two buckets in the 
middle of the room, and switch on the light. Boys would urinate 
in one bucket, girls in the other. It may have been then, at 
the age of three or four, that I felt the first stirrings of 
something sexual and I saw totally naked girls. We all slept 
naked, and when we went to urinate when the light was on it was 
naturally easy to see the contours of the body. At the time I 
understood nothing, but I was already aware that we were boys 
and they were girls, their bodies were a different shape and 
they had different organs. Of course, this was not physical 
attraction in the pure form, but I already grasped that they 
were girls. 
  Then I was moved to a kindergarten a bit further from home, 
but actually on Artilleriyskaya Street. This was not a 24-hour 
nursery but an ordinary kindergarten, and I was there from the 
ages of three to six. I was literally one month short of seven 
years old. In March 1953 my mother was asked to remove me 
because I was an uncontrollable child, got up to mischief, and 
disobeyed the teachers. I remember that one time at this 
kindergarten I pretended to be sick. I badly wanted not to be 
there, and I had heard that if you coughed a bit, they would say 
it was whooping cough and send you home. So one time I began to 
cough and cough and to pretend I had whooping cough. I don't 
remember whether the ruse worked and I was allowed to go home, 
but that is the kind of quick-wittedness I had even then. 
  I also remember how we were summoned to help unload the food 
that had been brought to the storeroom of the cafeteria at our 
kindergarten. Obviously, it was the older boys of five, six, 
and seven who did this. We played a trick on this occasion too. 
I remember we were unloading watermelons, and one melon 
happened to burst. One of the adults, the supply chief or cook, 
said we would have to eat the melon because it could not be 
kept, it would leak, so then we cunningly ensured that several 
more small melons burst. And we were allowed to eat those too. 
That was the kind of cunning and guile that arose in children's 
little heads even at that very early age. 
  I remember our games. We were all forced together to haul 
some large car. We trudged after each other hauling the car on 
a rope.... For some reason I did not like collective games. I 
liked to go off somewhere and play on my own. I remember the 
smell of these kindergartens, a specific smell -- children's 
underwear, children's food, children's bodies. And all the 
adults towering over us. I remember being punished. I was 
running along the corridor, and another boy was running along 
the corridor around the corner toward me. We collided at the 
corner since we had not seen each other, and for some reason he 
began to bleed. He was asked (I remember he was called Misha 
Iskhakov, he was a Kazakh, but a Russianized Kazakh): "What 
happened, Misha?" He pointed to me. And they immediately jumped 
to the conclusion that I had beaten the boy. No one had seen 
that we had simply had a clash of heads. This injustice in very 
early childhood hurt me badly. I was almost declared a 
hooligan. Throughout my later life I was often to encounter 
injustice. I would be detained, accused, and blamed for 
something although it was not my fault. But even after 40 years 
I remember this childhood incident as though it were today, so 
deep an impression did it make on me. 
  I remember 6 March 1953. I was running along the 
kindergarten corridor and I saw the nursery staff standing by 
the public-address system -- big black speakers, the very first 
ones. They were standing there and crying. Apparently there 
had been some kind of news that someone by the name of Stalin 
had died somewhere in Moscow. And I, a child with absolutely no 
grasp of politics, of course, nevertheless even then could not 
fathom why grown-ups, nursery assistants, the nurse, and 
teachers, were standing in a kindergarten corridor such a long 
way from Moscow and weeping. I ran on my way. Maybe this was 
the first glimmer of political consciousness, my first protest 
against the personality cult. For I believed even then that 
people should not weep if some alien person dies somewhere. At 
the time I did not know that he was regarded as the leader of 
the peoples and was the head of our state. But this very fact 
irritated and perplexed me even then: Why should everyone cry 
because someone dies somewhere? 
  In general that was my kindergarten, and I often did not 
want to go there. I would even forcibly dig my heels in, and my 
older sister Vera would almost beat me because Mom had given her 
the chore of taking me to kindergarten. Sometimes they asked 
the boy next door to take me there by deception. The main thing 
was to get rid of me, to ensure that I went through the gates 
and was out of sight for five or six hours. Sometimes I would 
run away from the kindergarten, and eventually I was taken away 
from there. I felt hurt, because I had seen the kind of sendoff 
that the older children got from the kindergarten. They were 
all already seven years old and a month or two before school, in 
the summer, some time in June, before the vacation, when parents 
would take children to dachas or simply on leave with them, the 
group of older children who would no longer return to the 
kindergarten but would go to school in September were usually 
lined up and presented with gifts -- school satchels, school 
things of one kind or another, pens, pencil cases, rulers. They 
were happy to be saying farewell to kindergarten, happy that 
they were being feted. But I was deprived of this red-letter 
day. Several times later in my life I was to be deprived of 
these children's red-letter days. I was left to myself. The 
few months before school flitted by quite imperceptibly, 
half-starving. I did a little to support myself by "foraging 
for food." Near home there were a lot of private houses with 
orchards, and I was one of the naughty boys who used to climb 
with friends into these gardens and take apples, pears, plums, 
and cherries. The extra food saved me somehow. On top of that 
there was the abundant summer sunshine and I wore almost nothing 
-- just shorts and sometimes a little T-shirt -- and almost 
always went around barefoot. This hardened my constitution. I 
grew up relatively healthy. Although I was always aware of not 
having enough to eat, I was always thin. There was nothing 
special about my clothing, either. 
  Then I turned seven. I have no recollection of my birthdays 
ever being celebrated in early childhood. The first time was 
when I was 12, and my aunt gave me R25 -- the old, prereform 
money -- and I was able to buy a fountain pen. I bought myself 
the first gift I had ever had. Later my sister gave me a chess 
set for one birthday. But I was given practically nothing. My 
birthday was first celebrated when I was 16, then 17 and 18. 
That was the end of my childhood, and I bade farewell to my 
mother's place. 
  First grade. I remember walking home from school. I was 
walking on my own, without Mom -- she was at work -- carrying my 
satchel. For the first time I had a sense of my new status. At 
the first lesson my first teacher, Mariya Petrovna Semisalova, 
told us: "Kids, you are now not merely boys, you are pupils, 
you are schoolboys." And I was conscious of this. From second 
grade we were to have coeducational classes, but in 1953 it was 
still just a boys' school. There I was, walking home after the 
first lesson, some time around noon, but no one was waiting for 
me at home. I put down my new satchel and took off my uniform. 
It was my first uniform, a little white high-collared jacket 
with buttons such as sailors or railroad workers wear and 
trousers. Mom had gotten hold of a bit of material from 
somewhere and had made me this outfit on a neighbor's sewing 
machine. It was expensive to buy it readymade, but you could 
get hold of the material cheaply or maybe even for free. I had 
no joy from this first day at school. Nobody saw me off to 
school, nobody met me. From birth I went everywhere alone, on 
my own, taking the direct route regardless of obstacles. And I 
always had a feeling of a kind of annoyance, bitterness, and 
dissatisfaction because I never experienced joy, any joy. No 
one feted me, no one hugged me, no one fondled me, no one said: 
"Well, Vova, you're off to school" or "Well, Vova, so now 
you're seven." My mother never had any time because she had to 
keep me. She left for work at 8 in the morning, returned 
exhausted at 6 or 7, cooked the meal, did the laundry, did the 
mending, did the cleaning. I remember my mother perpetually at 
the washtub, or doing the ironing, or going shopping. She was 
doing something her whole life, she never had any rest. She was 
not on the books at any rest home or sanatorium. And when she 
was on leave she never knew what to do with herself, my poor 
Mom, she would just wait for the start of work. She spent her 
whole life, all her 73 years in torment. Two months before her 
death she was to say to me: "Volodya, I have nothing to 
remember, not a single happy day." And when she died in May 
1985 I looked back over her life and I felt so bad that she had 
indeed experienced no joy. Nothing but humiliation and 
suffering all her life. 
  This was clearly the lot of our entire people. My mother 
and my father were born under the Russian Empire, my father in 
1907 and my mother in 1912. They were in torment throughout 
their lifetime. First the czar and the Russian empire, then 
revolution and civil war, then the Great Patriotic War, and 
those perpetual removals, perpetual formalities, passports, 
registrations, yes-you-cans and no you can'ts. They moved 
across the whole country, from Europe to Asia and went to an 
early grave. Their whole life was one big removal. So many 
cities, so many changes of apartment.... We put the whole 
nation on the move. The whole Russian people in a cart jingling 
along the ruts on country roads. For the entire 20th century. 
We got into space, we smashed the Germans. But we destroyed 
every family, every foundation, we lost all archives and ties of 
kinship. How many people were the subject of mix-ups and were 
mislaid. But how good things were at the beginning of the 
century. The Russian Empire. Both my father and my mother were 
equally subjects of the Russian Empire. Later borders would be 
drawn and it would no longer be Penza Guberniya but the 
Mordovian Republic, no longer the city of Vernyy but the Kazakh 
autonomous formation, then Union republic, and eventually 
independent Kazakhstan. Why, why this disaster for the 
family?... 
  So my memory of first grade is of me walking on my own in a 
little white outfit with a satchel up Dzherzhinskiy Street 
toward Dunganskaya Street, where I lived. Later it was renamed 
Masanchi Street. The Eurasian city of Alma-Ata. There was 
almost nothing Asian about the place, but geography made it 
necessary to regard it as Asian. Some 4,000 km southeast of 
Moscow. China and India were closer to us than Moscow. I 
studied for 11 years at the same school. A secondary school 
providing production training. We were trained as category II 
motor mechanics. From eighth grade we went to Alma-Ata's No 2 
Motor Repair Plant twice a week for hands-on training. We spent 
virtually the whole workday there, from 0800 to 1600 hours. 
  For the first four grades in elementary school we were taken 
by Mariya Petrovna Semisalova. Obviously kindergarten had left 
me a disobedient child, I was forever clashing with the teachers 
and getting low marks for behavior. Then I moved into fifth 
grade, where we had different teachers for different subjects. 
At some point in fifth or sixth grade I began to lag behind in 
arithmetic and algebra. Later I had difficulty with all these 
precise sciences. Especially as we began to do geometry and 
trigonometry. There were some failures, I could not remember the 
formulas and I found it hard to resolve the examples and 
problems, to draw geometry assignments, and to resolve 
trigonometrical formulas. Physics and chemistry didn't go very 
well, either. 
  In seventh grade I began to make something of an impression, 
and I was elected chairman of the detachment council. Our class 
teacher was Vera Yevgenyevna Chebotova, a mathematics teacher. 
By eighth grade we had a different class teacher. They often 
changed, our class had no luck. In ninth grade our class 
teacher was Yelena Mikhaylovna Blinder. I later learned that 
her real name was Esterna Moiseyevna. She had obviously 
Russianized her forename and patronymic under the influence of 
anti-Semitism. She was a strong, determined woman; she took our 
class for three years and did many useful things. At first she 
picked me out and helped my election as Komsomol [Leninist 
Communist Youth League] organizer for class 9. But after a few 
months she became disappointed with me, realizing that I was 
unbiddable and was not a "tame" Komsomol organizer. Then she 
used her authority in the opposite direction, and told another 
Komsomol meeting to hold fresh elections for my post. This was 
yet another blow, because I realized perfectly well that there 
were no grounds for fresh elections, that this was merely her 
wish because I did not suit her. But there were some toadies 
who began to make accusations against me, and eventually 
elections were held for my post and I again became an ordinary 
Komsomol member. 
  Was this perhaps the moment that marked the start of my 
opposition? At the age of 16 I became an oppositionist. I did 
not like the authoritarian style of the class teacher, who did 
not value a pupil in the senior grade as an individual but tried 
to steer him as a helmsman steers his craft. And a few small 
elements of my future political soul began to crystallize in 
this opposition. I disagreed with the fact that the class 
teacher was engaging in overreporting. In order to make the 
class one of the best and improve the grade figures, she would 
take a book herself, open it at any page, and put a "3" next to 
somebody else's "2," so we had fewer laggard pupils. But I 
realized that this was false. And she realized that I disagreed 
with this approach. Our paths diverged. In the future I would 
never be one of those people who would form the foundation of 
the nomenklatura, a functionary sucking up to his boss, someone 
who later ruined our whole country. I never became a 
"Democratic Russia" supporter and I never became a Communist. I 
was in opposition to both. 
  Naturally, the class teacher took surreptitious revenge on 
me. For instance, knowing that I was going to go to a higher 
educational establishment specializing in languages and was 
intending to go to Moscow, she did not give me a "5" for English 
language. Although she did give a "5" to another boy who didn't 
know the language as well as me. But he was very affectionate 
with her. In my time at school I had repeatedly run up against 
the fact that some pupils get good marks not for knowledge but 
because their parents treat the teachers well and bring gifts to 
school. My poor Mom did not bring gifts and almost never came 
to school. She had no time. But in the school and in the class 
there were many children from affluent families where the 
mothers did not work and could often come to school and often 
talk with the teachers, which naturally influenced attitudes 
toward their children. My Mom only rarely visited the school 
and there were no gifts, so I was treated either with 
indifference or with distaste. 
  Someone such as I was often chosen as a target for 
criticism. 
In some respects I myself gave grounds for this, since I was 
perhaps not always very forthcoming, broke the rules, and 
whispered during lessons. 
  I was a fidgety lad with rather curly hair and a loud voice 
-- in general, I got myself noticed. And one teacher had only 
to start criticizing me for all the rest to weigh in with more 
criticism. I often got low marks for behavior in the results 
for the term. But I experienced no particular trouble at 
school. Although I remember that in eighth grade there was a 
fight. One boy, his name was Oleg Kalinichenko, attacked me and 
I defended myself, this whole thing was deemed to be a fight, 
and we were both barred from school, I think for three days. 
Then we were put in different classes, he in 8b, me in 8a, and 
in a couple of months we were both put back in our original 8b. 
So there were some incidents at school. 
  The school director was called Selitskiy and the director of 
studies was Boris Funder (I don't remember his patronymic). 
There were a lot of Jews in Alma-Ata, both in class and in the 
city -- the Jewish community was strong in those years. The 
consequences of the population movements and migration were 
clearly a factor here. From the west, Jews had headed a long 
way east, and some ended up in Alma-Ata. They were particularly 
numerous among the intelligentsia, including teachers. And 
especially among the school leadership. There were also 
Germans. In general it was a multinational city -- there were 
Uighurs, Kazakhs, Uzbeks, Kyrgyz, Germans, Jews, Greeks, many 
different peoples. There were Koreans. There was a Korean in 
our class -- Volodya Kim -- and Sasha Pak was in the parallel 
class. There were some Kazakhs, but very few. I remember one 
-- Khalimova -- because her father was Kazakhstan's minister of 
motor transport. It later transpired that his education was 
limited to just four grades, but he was a Kazakh, so he became a 
minister in the republic. I experienced this ethnic oppression 
from the very earliest childhood. I would ask Mom: Why do we 
have such bad housing conditions? Why can't we get an 
individual apartment? Mom replied: "We aren't Kazakhs. It's 
hard for us to get an apartment here. Kazakhs get priority." 
Mom worked in an institute cafeteria, and the lecturers would 
often tell her about the examinations and about how they felt 
sorry for the Russian kids. A Russian would give an answer and 
get a "2," a Kazakh would give just the same answer and get a 
"4." The reason was that there was a need for national cadres. 
And Russian lads would be left feeling bitter outside higher 
educational establishments. While Kazakhs who did not have 
sufficient knowledge would be studying just because they were 
Kazakhs. Is this not ethnic discrimination, is this not ethnic 
oppression? Surely all this affected my heart and mind? I was 
more socially concerned because I had experienced "hazing" in 
the communal apartment when I was very small. And because I had 
had problems with my relationships in kindergarten and at 
school. I had no good friends or a girl with whom I was in 
love. By the age of 18 I was already socially concerned. 
  I graduated from 11th grade at School No 25 in Alma-Ata, 
where I had studied from 1 through 11b. We had a photograph 
taken of the whole class one last time. Mostly everyone 
remained in Alma-Ata, just two or three people left for other 
cities, including me. There were girls in our class and the 
neighboring class I rather liked, there were dates, kisses, 
calls, meetings. There were very pure youthful feelings, and 
then all this burned out. 
  I was thinking about the trip to Moscow, where once again I 
would have to adapt, once again there would be material 
hardships, once again there would be dormitories, hostels, all 
that communal living when there are four people to a room. 
Again there would be communal toilets, cafeterias, public 
catering, and on top of that, difficult studies in the language 
institute, where there were many new disciplines and standards 
were high -- all this weighed on the body and heart of the 
20-year-old young man. And at a time when you ought to be 
falling head over heels in love and dating girls, I was sitting 
at my studies. And later on, when I was 20-24, it was not the 
same, something had burned out, I had somehow missed out on this 
particularly early surge of the lyricism of love, there was 
nobody to set me on the right road, and this naturally 
impoverished my heart, and as a result I never really fell in 
love with anyone. And throughout my later life I have never met 
the woman I need, the woman I can love. 
  My love for my mother may have played a part. After all, I 
grew up without a father, and on top of that with a stepfather 
who treated me badly. Everything my child's heart was capable 
of feeling was channeled toward my mother, I loved her very 
much. I could not imagine her dying or disappearing somewhere. 
Probably my entire potential for love was taken over by filial 
mother love, including the potential for boy-girl love. You 
only have one heart, one impulse to love, and mine was entirely 
focused on my mother. I loved her. Loved her very much. It 
was a double love, a triple love. Double because I loved her 
for my father as well, and triple because I saw her sufferings. 
I felt great sympathy for her, and sometimes I would see her 
tears and ask: "Mom, why are you crying?" And she would reply: 
"When you're grown up, son, you'll understand." And later I 
did understand that her life was unhappy. She had had a hard 
time with her first husband because she married as a 16-year-old 
who knew nothing about life. A couple of years were added to 
her age so she could marry. And she immediately had a baby, 
then another, until there were five. Her whole youth passed by 
while she spent a couple of years of sleepless nights looking 
after each child. She had virtually no sleep for nine years! 
She did not get on with her relatives. For some reason her 
brothers and sisters disliked her. Her sisters may have been 
envious that she had made a successful marriage to a military 
man -- they enjoyed certain privileges at that time. Relations 
were poor for some reason, and because her first husband was a 
communist and his work was special, military service, he did not 
want my mother to meet very often with members of her family or 
with her mother, my grandmother, because grandmother had been 
stripped of the right to vote. During the NEP [Lenin's New 
Economic Policy] years, when my grandfather had already died, my 
grandmother Fiona Nikiforovna Makarova, with five children to 
look after, opened a business. That was the slogan at the time. 
On the ground floor of her two-story wooden house she opened a 
small cafeteria which the local prosecutor, deputy, and judges 
used to visit. Then the NEP was wound up. And my grandmother 
was exiled to Solovki. By this time Mom and her elder sister 
were already married, but her younger sister Anna and brothers 
Petr and Vasiliy were unlucky, they were left with nobody to 
look after them. Sometimes they would go to my mother to get 
something to eat, but her husband, Andrey Vasilyevich, did not 
like this. He did not want my mother to meet with persons who 
were regarded as enemies of the people and were alien elements. 
This social hostility turned into family hostility. 
  Mom used to recall how during the thirties it was demanded 
that all servicemen's wives surrender all their gold. For the 
benefit of the Red Army, in order to strengthen defenses. And 
Mom gave up everything she had -- some lightweight jewelry, a 
ring, earrings -- because her husband was a colonel in the Red 
Army. All this was accepted merely by weight, and she received 
half a kilogram of candy, a few sweets, for the gold things she 
had inherited from her grandmother and great-grandmother. 
  So from childhood I experienced snubs on all sides, social 
hostility, and hostility among relatives. I grew up in an 
atmosphere where there was no warmth, not from anyone -- neither 
from relatives nor from friends and teachers. Nobody ever 
wanted me around, I was always in everybody's way, I was the 
target of criticism. I was almost never praised, usually they 
would "go on at" me about my bad points. There was nothing I 
was good at, I was not a very strong boy. I had no sporting 
achievements, although I tried my hand at unarmed combat, 
cycling, soccer, fencing, and shooting -- I tried everything. 
But there was nobody to show me the ropes so I could really get 
to grips with any type of sport. I wanted to do gymnastics, but 
it didn't work out. I had a bit of success at shooting. Prone, 
with a small-caliber rifle, I would score 96 out of 100. 
Apparently that was category three for men. I had no special 
talents in art or science either. I badly wanted to play the 
piano, but we didn't have a piano at home. I joined the brass 
band at the House of Young Pioneers. I think the instrument I 
played was called the tenor. But because I had no particular 
aptitude I gave it up after a few months. Then I joined a 
string ensemble at school. I played a folk instrument, the 
domra. I used to strum a bit as well, but I gave that up too. 
I tried to learn the guitar on my own, I bought a 
teach-yourself book and began learning, but it didn't work out. 
I bred pigeons, rabbits, and chickens. We even had a couple of 
goats at home. I worked for a couple of hours as a herdsman. 
That was probably my first-ever job. We did not have a dacha 
or relatives in the country, so as a schoolboy I used to run 
around the house during the vacations. Our neighbor had a cow. 
She noticed I was at a loose end and decided to use me as a 
herdsman, for half a liter of milk. One fine day I agreed, and 
I looked after her cow for a few hours, then drove it back to 
the shed. I was given half a liter of milk and I took it home, 
thinking Mom would be pleased I had earned half a liter of milk. 
But on the contrary Mom was annoyed, she didn't like her son 
being a herdsman. For some reason the lower people's social 
status is, the more they want their children's to be higher. So 
Mom forbade me to do this. 
  I remember I had a go at trading. Someone once brought us 
some peas and I decided to sell them. Ours was a quiet street 
not far from the market. I sat down and laid out my peas, but 
no one bought any of them from me. On the roof of our two-story 
house (you could clamber out onto the roof) was a long plank you 
could sunbathe on, and we boys from the same block would often 
dream up schemes for getting rich. Raise 100 chickens, sell 
them, buy a sheep, raise 20 sheep, buy a cow, raise cows, buy an 
elephant.... 
  Those were our dreams.... We watched the bees and fish going 
about their daily lives, we started smoking, we ran to the 
river, we tried to learn to swim, and I myself learned to swim. 
The river was called the Vesnovka. The boys in the 
neighborhood were embittered and quarrelsome. But there were 
almost none like that among my immediate neighbors. My postwar 
childhood passed in relative tranquility -- almost without 
hooliganism, half-starving, half in rags. Most of the kids 
around me were just as badly dressed as I was, and no one was 
particularly wealthy. I remember how amazed I was by a 
ballpoint pen belonging to a girl in our class. At the time 
these pens had only just appeared and I did not have one. Later 
we went to the girl's birthday, and their house had hot water. 
I was amazed -- our house didn't have hot water. We did not 
have a bath, just a toilet. If I wanted a bath I had to take a 
walk to the bathhouse. I hated waiting in line for a couple of 
hours at the bathhouse -- it was a company bathhouse, it 
belonged to the Turkestan-Siberia Railroad, and railroad workers 
did not have to wait in line. I remember the wooden cubicles 
where we undressed, the men all had the same shorts -- 
knee-length sateen. Everything was the same, even the color of 
men's shorts. There were four colors at most -- black, brown, 
blue, and dark green. Any other color, let alone anything with 
flowers on, or stripes, or like swimming trunks, would have been 
regarded as meaning you were crazy. Such were the times and 
attitudes. So much time was spent waiting in line at the 
bathhouse because we had no bath or shower. The little boy Vova 
would spend several hours a week sitting in line at the communal 
bathhouse, where you could not always find even a washbasin, 
standing in line for the hot taps, where the dirt and soapsuds 
dribbled across the floor.... All this was my childhood. 
  Along with the Alatau mountains, with their non-Russian 
name. 
We called them simply the mountains. We would go to the 
mountains and I would pick wild cherry-plums and pears. We 
would make dams and bathe. We smashed light bulbs and windows, 
engaged in a bit of petty hooliganism and even a bit of 
shoplifting. I remember the first self-service stores had 
opened, and we used to go there to steal candy. You could walk 
in because the sales staff were only at the exit, where people 
presented their shopping, and put candy inside your shirt or in 
your pocket. It was simply mischief, and it's a good job we 
didn't get into the habit of it. But we might have done, and 
then life would have turned out differently. We would have 
begun to do the rounds of correctional labor colonies and jails. 
It doesn't take much for a boy to go astray. 
  We were taken along to the militia on several occasions. One 
time we were returning from a swim, and we thought we had 
crossed the street where you were not allowed to. All of a 
sudden we heard a militiaman's whistle and the sound of 
footsteps, as though he was running toward us. We were scared 
and "ran for it." He began to gain ground on us, so we 
scattered, and for some reason he chose to follow me. He caught 
up with me, and I resisted, shouting and yelling. Naturally, 
nobody intervened or came to my assistance, and he led me off 
and handed me over to the nearest children's unit [detskaya 
komnata]. Later he explained that apparently he had been told 
that we had taken some woman's bag. Someone had complained to 
him, saying: Those are the boys, they were the hooligans. And 
he had run after us. We were scared of him because we thought 
we had crossed the street in the wrong place. That was how I 
ended up in a militia children's unit for the first time. I 
held out for a long time and would not say where I lived or who 
my parents were. But later I reached my parents via our 
neighbors' phone and Mom came along with my stepfather, and I 
was released. 
  The second time I was picked up for walking in the wrong 
place. Not far from home there was a new stadium, and the street 
had not yet been divided into roadway and sidewalk. There was 
gravel everywhere. People always used the whole width of the 
street -- roadway and sidewalk -- when they walked to the 
stadium. And I, a boy, also did this one day when there was no 
soccer match, and a Kazakh militiaman decided that this was a 
violation. He grabbed me, put me in a dump truck, and took me 
to the children's unit. He obviously had a target to meet. For 
bringing in offenders. They held me for a while then let me go. 
  Finally, on the third occasion, I was taken to the militia 
precinct house. I had been returning with Mom and my stepfather 
from the movies. When we reached the trolleybus stop there were 
some kids there from our block and they were laughing and 
talking. I stayed there with them, and my parents went home. We 
were standing near a smashed-up bench. A militia car drove up 
and a militiaman got out and came over to us, because he was 
obviously interested in a group of boys talking loudly about 
something and gesticulating. At this moment an elderly woman 
nearby muttered: "Those hooligans, they've been smashing up the 
benches." Barely pausing for thought, the militiaman grabbed 
the two nearest boys, one of whom was me: He put us in the car 
and drove us to the precinct house. He told the duty officer: 
They've been engaging in hooliganism. So I was taken in to the 
militia three times during my childhood. By the age of 18 I had 
learned a lot. Although I did not become a thief, did not 
become a hooligan, swindled no one, did not beat anyone, and did 
not do anything bad, it was a near thing. Such was life. I 
remember we threw smoke bombs into a trolleybus -- this was 
wrong, of course, someone could have been hurt. It was 
mischief. We wanted adventures. We would buy pacifiers from 
the drugstore, blow them up, make a little hole, fill them with 
water, and splash ourselves -- and cars and passersby. We 
sought adventures, we needed something because we were not sent 
to sections, hobby groups, or technical hobby centers, we did 
not have enough to do. So, left to ourselves, we made our own 
amusements, but, thank God, this was just mischief and 
naughtiness. I did not overstep the mark beyond which crime 
begins. This was clearly part of my father's genes. High 
culture. There were instances where I could have joined other 
boys in attacking and beating someone, but I did not do so. I 
was not cut out for thieving and crime. Only pranks -- climbing 
into somebody else's orchard and picking apples -- and anyhow, 
in the senior grades I put all this behind me. 
  Social problems were now beginning to concern me, and I was 
buying books: fundamentals of political knowledge, basic 
principles of economics and philosophy. Popular books on the 
social sciences like that were published at that time. I used 
to read them, I wanted to read them. I began to think about my 
future profession. My first wish was to join the army and 
become an officer. My two older brothers were in the army -- 
this may have been a factor. Military units marched past our 
home -- cavalry, military hardware, and ordinary soldiers. This 
made a strong impression on me. There were a great many movies 
about the war at that time. And military themes prompted me to 
become an officer and graduate from military school. Then I was 
drawn toward a legal speciality, I wanted to be an investigator. 
Obviously I was also excited by movies about criminals, 
murderers, thieves, and investigators. Finally, my third desire 
was to become a diplomat. A relative, my cousin's husband, once 
said: "Volodya, go to Moscow, enter the Moscow State Institute 
of International Relations, and become a diplomat. That's the 
life." I was indeed interested in foreign policy. I spent a 
long time looking at the atlas, I was attracted by other 
countries, I knew what the continents are, I loved geography 
lessons. I was attracted to politics. Philosophy, economics, 
foreign policy, social problems, the nationalities question -- I 
had already somehow experienced all this for myself in practice. 
Eventually I mastered everything, and I decided to go to Moscow 
and to enter if not the Moscow State Institute of International 
Relations, then at least its oriental counterpart -- the Moscow 
State University Institute of Oriental Languages. I did not 
become an officer -- at the military commissariat I was told 
there was no military school of the sort I wanted to enter. For 
some reason I was attracted to the internal troops. I had gone 
to the military commissariat and said that I wanted to enter a 
military school training officers for the internal troops. 
Maybe at the time there was indeed no such school or there were 
very few of them. At any rate, I was told: No, we don't know 
of any. And that was it. After that couldn't-care-less 
attitude on the part of the official at the military 
commissariat -- well, since there was no such school, my 
connection with the army was severed and I went in the foreign 
policy direction. 
  I graduated from school with no "3's"; my certificate showed 
mostly "4's," with two or three "5's," and I had a certificate 
awarding me the qualification of category two motor mechanic. I 
said goodbye to my girl, toward whom my feelings had already 
cooled. She was called Sveta. By this time I was 18, like her. 
  Moscow boys at this time already had a real sex life. But 
so far all I, a boy from a provincial city, had had was my first 
kisses. My first attempts to have sex were unsuccessful. At 
the age of 17 and 18 I was very timid and shy. I remember once 
at a sanatorium near Sochi to which I had gone with the class 
for a vacation on the Black Sea, I lay down with a girl, she was 
wearing a swimsuit, we got along fine, we were friendly. And I 
asked her to take off her panties. But what girl would take the 
initiative in removing her panties? I didn't know I ought to 
have done this myself, I ought to have helped her, I too was 
embarrassed. So we lay there until someone disturbed us. This 
shyness and timidity prevented me from starting my sex life when 
I already wanted to. Later on I may actually have been very 
insolent in my behavior with girls, but at first I was pure. I 
was very timid. Maybe even shy. I think I inherited this from 
my father. 
  Now came my social maturity. On 3 June 1964 I flew to 
Moscow, to Vnukovo Airport, in an IL-18 with a small suitcase 
containing the most basic necessities -- a shirt, a change of 
underwear, I don't even think I had a spare pair of boots. In 
my other hand I had a basket of strawberries and tomatoes. At 
home they began to ripen very early and were comparatively 
cheap. Mom said: Take them, maybe you can give them to someone 
on the admissions panel and they will treat you better. She did 
not realize that this would certainly have been the first bribe 
in my life if I had indeed taken the basket of strawberries to 
the admissions panel. But I was young, I did not have any 
thoughts like that in my head. For convenience I simply left the 
basket in a baggage locker. Why lug it around when I still 
didn't know where I was going? I arrived right in the center of 
Moscow, on Red Square. The airport bus stopped outside the 
Lenin museum, and I found out the address of the Institute of 
Oriental Languages from the information bureau. The institute 
was opposite, on the other side of the Manezh, near the Hotel 
"Natsional." I went there and presented my documents, and then 
came the first blow. The documents did not meet the 
requirements for entrants to the higher educational 
establishment. One of the main documents was missing: the 
recommendation from the Komsomol rayon committee. I did not 
know this. Before this I had written to my brother, who lived 
in Moscow and was a soldier, asking him to find out the terms 
for admission to the Moscow State Institute of International 
Relations. He was told that the Moscow State Institute of 
International Relations did not have a hostel. That was 
deception. It did have a hostel. But that was how they stopped 
boys from out of town entering this institute. So I did not 
enter the Moscow State Institute of International Relations, if 
only because they could not provide me with a hostel. Anyhow, I 
would not have been able to get though the entrance competition, 
because you had to muster 15 points, and I would have had no 
chance of getting "5's" for geography, composition, and English. 
I had stopped studying geography in ninth grade, and I had 
never taken a refresher course. It's practically impossible to 
get a "5" for composition. And it would be unrealistic of me to 
expect a graduate from an ordinary school in a provincial city 
to pass English when boys from Moscow special schools could not 
always get a "5" even when they had lived abroad with their 
parents. So I went to the Institute of Oriental Languages. But 
there, too, you had to have a letter of recommendation. I went 
to stay with my brother near Moscow and urgently wrote a letter 
to Mom. She managed somehow to get the letter of recommendation 
from the local Komsomol rayon committee and sent it to me, and I 
submitted the documents to the institute. 
  I was assigned to a hostel, I got a bed, and I began to 
prepare for the examinations. I knew my knowledge of English 
was inadequate. But I had to take five exams. Oral and written 
Russian, history, oral and written English. I went to the 
institute and directly asked a woman whether she could help me 
to find an English language teacher. I apparently made a good 
impression on her -- at any rate, she gave me the phone number 
of a woman teacher. This teacher lived somewhere in Rechnoy 
Vokzal [area around riverboat station in northwest Moscow], so I 
went there and began to study. After the first class she said I 
had to pay R10. I was very surprised, it seemed an enormous sum 
to me. I wrote Mom again, she was on leave at the time, but she 
went to work so she could send me the money for the tutor. In 
total I think I paid R100. That was a tremendous sum for me. 
But I passed the exams. I got a "3" for composition, "4" for 
oral Russian and literature, "5" for history, "3" for written 
English, and "3" for oral English. That was enough to get in. 
Humanities higher education establishments were not in demand 
at that time. Everyone was trying to get into the Moscow 
Engineering and Physics Institute, the Physico-Technical 
Institute, and the Baumanskiy Institute. The Institute of 
Oriental Languages was not especially popular among humanities 
institutes. There was not much competition, just three people 
per place. And in practice everyone who passed the last exam 
was enrolled. 
  I received my student card and my first reprimand from the 
dean. He asked why I was unshaven. I had still not begun to 
shave; I had fluff on my chin. I was warned there would be no 
grant because of my "3's" in the entrance exams. This was yet 
another blow. So I constantly received blows, every month. 
This was to continue until the present time. Thank God they 
did not refuse me a place in the hostel. And despite everything 
they did give me a grant, R35. Also Mom promised to send R30. 
So I studied for five years on those R65. Of course, once 
again I ate badly and was badly dressed. What could I buy for 
R65? I had to pay for the hostel, I had to buy books. Pens, 
notebooks, ice cream, movie tickets -- all these cost money 
too. Then there was food every day. I could not spend more 
than R2 on the lot, since I had only R65, R3 of which went on 
the hostel, and I also had to get around, so I had a maximum of 
R2 a day. But I was young. And if we were going to go to a 
cafe, for instance, and order something, I naturally always had 
problems. To say nothing of dates with girls, movie tickets, or 
tickets for concerts and dances. My whole life was poverty. I 
never had money for anything. But on the other hand I applied 
myself with frenzy to my studies. 
  It was a humanities higher educational establishment, so 
there was no more of my least favorite subjects -- mathematics, 
physics, chemistry, drawing, biology. There were only 
humanities subjects. But here too there were ones I disliked. 
For instance, an introduction to special philology -- in 
general I disliked the philological disciplines. I liked 
history, but the faculty was called the historico-philological 
faculty. I got into the philology department. Was this because 
I had written on my application: Turkish language and 
literature? I found myself in the philology department. That 
was another mistake. Thank God I got into the Turkish 
department; after all, I could have ended up in the Mongolian or 
Vietnamese department, or doing some African language -- Bambara 
or Malinke. 
  So there I was, a student with a miserly grant and a bed in 
a 
hostel, without friends, on my own in an unfamiliar city. It 
took a lot of effort to adjust and acquire my first comrades and 
a few personal contacts. But my main efforts were devoted to my 
studies. I began to do well, and literally in my second year I 
began to receive a bigger grant. This was R47.50. I received a 
bigger grant for several semesters in succession. I was elected 
group senior, and then Komsomol organizer in years four through 
six. I began to be politically active in 1967. I sent a letter 
to the CPSU Central Committee on 15 April 1967 and in an appeal 
to the country's leadership I proposed carrying out reforms in 
the spheres of agriculture, education, and industry. I felt we 
were heading in the wrong direction and developing the wrong 
way, the life around me suggested this. There were classes on 
political economy, philosophy, and the history of the CPSU and 
contacts with my contemporaries and lecturers. So 15 April 1967 
marks the start of my conscious, active political life. In 
December 1967 I took another step. I made a hard-hitting speech 
at a debate on "Democracy Over There (that is, in the West) and 
in Our Country (that is, the USSR)." This displeased some 
people. Thus I came to the notice of the leadership of the 
Institute of Oriental Languages, particularly of Rector A.A. 
Kovalev and Prorector M.F. Yuryev. Then in January 1968 the 
first political blow came. My character reference for a 
one-month trip to Turkey as a translator with a sporting 
delegation was rejected on the grounds that I was politically 
unreliable. This was very annoying. At that time dissidents 
had already emerged and there were trials. Daniel, Sinyavskiy, 
Solzhenitsyn.... Some people were banned, some were expelled. 
But I was not in this league, I had merely spoken out 
spontaneously, but even this was enough for me to be regarded as 
unreliable. This naturally made me angry. Especially as our 
period of study abroad was coming up, our whole fifth year was 
devoted to practical experience. I was assigned to the Radio 
Committee and I spent eight months there as a student trainee 
working on the Turkish desk in the section broadcasting to 
foreign countries. Then I switched to practical training at the 
State Committee for Foreign Economic Relations. I badly wanted 
to travel to Turkey; after all, I was studying the country and 
the language. But relations were weak and none of the students 
went there. I learned that there was a possibility of traveling 
to Turkey with a delegation of engineers via the State Committee 
for Foreign Economic Relations and I made the maximum effort to 
ensure that my character reference was approved, despite 
everything. In April 1969 I traveled to a capitalist country 
for the first time. Before this, in 1966, I had had my first 
trip abroad -- to Hungary, as a member of the Moscow State 
University student construction detachment. As I now recall, we 
passed through the Csop border station and we were on the 
Hungarian side, and there was a Hungarian girl pushing a cart 
with sweets and drinks. I realized for the first time that I 
was abroad, here it was, a foreign country. I greatly liked 
Budapest and I fell in love there with a Hungarian girl called 
Anike. There were dates and kisses, then we exchanged letters 
for a few months. That was all. But 6 weeks in Budapest! We 
spent a month working on a construction project, then we 
traveled around the country. We had a vacation at Lake Balaton. 
  I also went to a student camp near Anapa on the Black Sea 
and to a vacation center at Krasnovidovo outside Moscow under 
the auspices of Moscow State University -- once again there were 
dances and a few acquaintances with girls. But during these 
student years I really had no girl. I badly wanted to fall in 
love with someone and date her, but it did not work out, I could 
not. Obviously I myself was to blame. I was too concerned with 
social problems; I was devoting too much effort and energy to my 
studies. The price of this was lack of a personal life. 
  So I virtually sent myself on an eight-month stint abroad in 
Turkey. There was a bit of an incident there; they tried to 
accuse me of conducting communist propaganda because I had given 
Soviet badges to local Turkish kids. Once again I was unlucky. 
There were constant blows of fate the whole time. Every month, 
every year. My mother's husband died, another blow. I had to 
travel to Alma-Ata and help Mom to pay her last respects. In 
general, there was little joy. And when my mother said she had 
lived her life and there had not been a single happy day, there 
was nothing to remember, I thought in similar terms about 
myself: I too had already lived a sizable part of my life, I 
too had had almost no happy day. I remember starting school -- 
there was no joy, no one shared this joy with me. I graduated 
from school -- once again there was little joy because I had to 
go to an alien city, I was short of money, and I did not know 
whether or not I would get into the institute.... I graduated 
from my higher educational establishment with distinction, but 
once again there was nobody to share the joy with. I graduated 
from Moscow University with distinction and received my Red 
Diploma in the Moscow State University assembly hall on the 
Lenin Hills. But no one was there with me, there was no one to 
be happy for me and share my joy. I took the Red Diploma back 
to my room in the hostel, and there was not even anyone to drink 
a glass of champagne with. I was entirely alone. 
  When I graduated from the higher educational establishment I 
wanted to buy a car. Using the certificates I had earned in 
Turkey, I bought myself a Zaporozhets, and it stood outside the 
window, without a garage. I was assigned to the army. And 
where -- Tbilisi! Once again an alien city and an alien 
republic. I had only just gotten back from Turkey, where there 
had been all that trouble, and now I was off to Georgia. Why 
not Russia, why was I being assigned to the army, why not 
others? That cholera-stricken summer of 1970 I drove in my 
Zaporozhets to Tbilisi via Anapa. I stayed for the last time in 
the student camp where I had been in 1968, where on one visit I 
met my future comrade, the mathematician Vladimir Aleksin. He 
did not become a great friend of mine, but we kept in touch for 
about 20 years or even more, about 25 years. Once again I was 
unlucky. We were acquaintances, but not friends. There was 
someone else I knew, again we met via university. Aleksandr, a 
physicist. Again it was the same story. We called each other, 
we traveled together to vacation centers. But there was no 
friendship.... 
  My youth.... I had no luck in life because I think I had no 
close friend. In the block where I was born there were five or 
six local boys, and they were all different, but there was no 
warm friendship with any of them. Clearly, this was my fate, 
never really to experience anything of either love or 
friendship. Relations with my family were not all that warm 
either. Obviously it was fate. And all this, taken together, 
affected my life. Maybe it's like an artist or a composer who 
needs unhappiness in order to create, in order to bring 
inspiration. It was the same with me -- so I could develop a 
better and more profound understanding of political processes in 
society, I experienced a degree of disadvantage in all other 
respects. The wrong food, the wrong clothes, maybe the wrong 
comrades, the wrong entertainments, the lack of brilliant 
successes during my early education, in sport, and in any other 
forms of activity. In fact maybe this is an objective process. 
All my energy had to be focused on one thing. If there had 
been a girl I loved maybe I would have devoted half my energy or 
a large part to her, if I had had a very close friend this would 
have taken up time. If I had had very good relations with my 
family once again I would have spent a lot of time on contacts 
with them. But things worked out in such a way that, 
willy-nilly, I constantly devoted myself to social questions. I 
felt constant social concern, and I thought about society and 
its problems, about social questions, and about relations 
between people. The constant sense of dissatisfaction was a 
stimulus. 
  After all, you cannot engage in politics for no particular 
reason. It's not a favorite school subject, physics, say, where 
there are specific laws associated with the theory and the 
subject. Politics as an art is a special sphere of activity, 
and not everyone can grasp it. Perhaps anybody can go to a 
rally, stand there, and listen; anyone can make a few comments 
of their own and put forward slogans, but to get thoroughly to 
grips with politics requires knowledge, above all of the 
humanities. Knowledge of history, economics, philosophy, and 
jurisprudence. And also the potential to make you want to do 
this. Like an artist, someone who wants to engage in politics 
must formulate his own ideas, find an opportunity to express 
them, and meet with approval. Without recognition, a politician 
will get nowhere. Just like an artist who cannot find anyone who 
admires his talent. But artists sometimes get posthumous 
recognition. It is harder for politicians. A politician has to 
secure recognition during his lifetime. Otherwise he simply 
does not make it as a politician, people simply forget about 
him, and his name does not feature anywhere. "Does not feature 
on the lists." An artist can leave pictures, a writer an 
unpublished work, but it is very difficult for a politician to 
appear anywhere in the annals of history. He is usually 
topical. He is of the present. 
  My disadvantaged personal life helped make me a good 
student, 
I tried to find some sort of satisfaction from this, and I 
graduated with distinction from the Institute of Asian and 
African Countries. Then came the army. For some reason 
everybody is reluctant to join the army, but I felt I needed 
this. I was drawn to politics, and I realized that army service 
would help me, even with regard to my biography, because people 
can always ask: Why did you not serve in the army? Why did you 
avoid this extremely important institution in our social life? 
Especially as I served as an officer in the Transcaucasus 
Military District Staff Political Directorate. At that time 
Georgia was still ruled by Mzhavanadze, he was the next-to-last 
Georgian "czar" and first secretary of the Georgian Communist 
Party Central Committee. Bribery and nepotism flourished 
luxuriantly under him. This was the period I encountered, but 
after I had left, in 1972 they appointed Shevardnadze, who 
attempted to use Andropov-style methods to impose order in 
Georgia for the whole period through 1985, until Gorbachev moved 
him to Moscow. 
  My two years in the army were very useful to me. First, I 
got to know the army itself, I got to know political work. I 
got to know some aspects connected with special propaganda and 
intelligence and I made a deeper study of the nationalities 
question. I had quite a good knowledge of nationalities 
problems even previously, but the Transcaucasus area was 
different from Central Asia. Here I also saw the situation that 
later led to the perestroyka factors. There was really no 
Soviet power there and there were no real communists -- all this 
rottenness and communist scum effectively corrupted the Russian 
communists too. And the main problem emanated from there, from 
the south. All Russia's problems are in the south. So until we 
resolve our southern problem [uzel] we will never extricate 
ourselves from the protracted crisis, which will periodically 
worsen. 
  I managed to get myself a room -- 26 square meters. It would 
have been difficult and expensive to live in a hotel. It was 
hard to get a room, but I approached the members of the military 
council, the chief of the political directorate, and some other 
people.... I paid just R3. Once again it meant long corridors 
and communal kitchens and toilets. But one room was my own. I 
found myself a neighbor, Valya Malik, a lad from Ukraine who had 
been to the special communications school in Sumy that trains 
specialists for the eighth sections of staffs. I lived there 
with him for almost two years. I lived on my own for the last 
few months. 
  I got to know Georgia and visited Armenia and Tskhinvali. I 
studied the people's life, customs, and culture. For some 
reason I had no desire to study Georgian. In two years of 
contact with the Georgians I could have studied the language, 
but I knew just two or three common phrases and understood 
nothing more. And I did not want to, I had absolutely no desire 
to study this language. I was probably tired of learning 
foreign languages since everywhere I felt myself discriminated 
against -- in Alma-Ata, where Kazakh was the dominant language. 
In Turkey, where it was Turkish. But at least Turkey was 
indeed a different country. Now in Georgia it was Georgian, and 
Azerbaijan was nearby, where it was Azeri.... 
  I often went on assignments. I delivered lectures among 
the troops. I wrote pamphlets. I studied Turkey, Iran, the 
Near East, the Arab world. All this was useful for my general 
development. I gained a deeper grasp of domestic and foreign 
policy processes in the country. I was now a specialist, a 
orientalist with practical experience. I had been to Turkey, I 
had been to the Caucasus, as a child I had lived in Central Asia 
-- all this helped me gain a deeper knowledge of problems 
associated with the Muslim religion. There was the Georgian 
church, the Armenian church, and the Kurds. I could directly 
see and observe them in the Transcaucasus and in Turkey. All 
this was useful. Although there were also moments of sadness. 
My wife refused to come with me, she was writing a thesis. She 
did not want to leave Moscow. We would meet mostly on holidays 
-- sometimes she would visit me, sometimes I would visit her. 
This nomadic way of life for almost 18 months brought no joy, 
of course. Nevertheless, I saved up a sum of money and returned 
home with the first payment for a cooperative three-room 
apartment. I made the payment independently. Later I earned 
the money for a set of furniture. My wife's parents helped us 
to buy bedroom furniture, and we joined forces to equip the 
kitchen, so bit by bit we furnished our three-room apartment. 
  One time I stayed at my mother-in-law's for almost a year. 
This too was unpleasant. We got along okay, I was not treated 
badly. But I felt a degree of hostility and incompatibility. 
Finally, 9 May 1973, I was a civilian with a wife and son, in 
my own apartment. But once again in a remote and inconvenient 
place, on the outskirts of Moscow. Teplyy Stan. There was no 
subway station nearby, no movie theaters, no phone. Nothing but 
a construction site almost at the beltway. We were on the 
ground floor, it was cold, and in general we were frightened. 
Once again we had to change our apartment. We did not succeed 
in moving somewhere else in the same block. With great 
difficulty I became chairman of the cooperative, worked for a 
year or 18 months, and came up with a possible exchange in 
another block where people were moving out of five apartments. 
So I found myself in a different block, on the eighth floor. 
Once again I was at the end of my strength and, most of all, 
how tired I felt at the ages of 27, 28, and 29 -- I had a new 
job, I was starting out on ordinary family life together, the 
child meant kindergarten and sicknesses, the cooperative 
apartment was expensive, and we needed to move to a different 
floor, and that meant voluntary work. And at work I had to take 
on some additional voluntary responsibilities, teach French as 
well, improve my English, and learn German. On top of that I 
continued to study at the Moscow State University law faculty 
night school. All this was a terrible workload, I have no idea 
how I endured it. My best years were frittered away on trivial 
concerns which I could have been relieved of. But once again, 
everything seemed to be pushing me toward just one thing -- more 
knowledge, a better grasp of social problems -- cooperative 
housing construction, family matters, my relations with my 
in-laws, my job, the problems of labor collectives, trade union 
committees, party committees, leaders, party meetings, CPSU 
Congresses, discussion of the 1977 new constitution -- I took 
part in all this, it was like hail, like rain, like a hurricane, 
this all hardened me. It did not make me a dissident, an enemy, 
but it helped to shape my identity, my political identity. I 
saw the shortcomings, saw the blunders, saw the mistakes. At 
the same time I did not feel bitter toward the ordinary 
communists alongside me, they worked just the same, they were 
not enemies of our country. But at one time they had been 
forced to join the party, otherwise they would not have been 
able to study or to take up a post. I understood this, and I 
experienced similar difficulty because, without a party card and 
without joining the CPSU, my opportunities for promotion, for 
moving to other establishments, and for studies -- for instance, 
postgraduate work or studies in an academy -- were limited. All 
that was closed to me. You see the world as a world of 
apartheid when you're a nonparty person. From childhood I had 
experienced ethnic oppression since I had lived in non-Russian 
regions. Now I was living in Moscow. I seemed to be in Russia, 
in the capital, but here too there was oppression -- political 
oppression. I was n/p, a nonparty person. What was more, this 
was especially keenly felt in work verging upon the political, 
for by virtue of both my first and second educations I was 
connected in one way or another with the state apparatus and 
with work in central institutions, where party connections were 
an essential, mandatory phenomenon and I was, so to speak, 
condemned in advance to a secondary role and nobody wanted me. 
Personnel officers would set aside my "file" as soon as they 
saw the entry for "party membership" -- n/p. I belonged to a 
different caste, as it were. At the Communist Party meetings 
which I would sometimes attend, they would say: Now we're going 
to have the closed part of the meeting, Vladimir Volfovich, 
you'd better go. So I would go. This was very annoying. 
  All these factors seemed to be coming on top of each other. 
My unhappy childhood, the lack of good friends, poor everyday 
living conditions, bad food, poor leisure, nonparty status, the 
fact that I had lived in various regions -- all this was the 
foundation on which my political identity began to mature. If I 
had been born in an affluent family in a Russian city, among 
Russian people, and had never moved anywhere, if my childhood 
friends and the girl I loved had been right there next to me, 
then maybe I would have turned my back on politics. 
  Gorbachev had an easy life. Why did he ruin the country, why 
could he not do any good? He was weak because he had it all. 
He was the son of a kolkhoz chairman, in other words, the son 
of a landowner. He lived like a little lord even then. Then he 
entered Moscow University and began to do Komsomol work. He got 
it all straightaway and enjoyed life. He did not have the 
potential to be a political leader. It was an ordinary career 
for a functionary. So he could not become a statesman and 
became a destroyer, an adventurist, a voluntarist. Khrushchev 
was the same. He worked in a mine. Then he graduated from the 
"Red" academy. He had absolutely no education in the 
humanities. Andropov too was an uneducated person. There is 
that stupid little line in his biography: He has higher 
education. What did that mean? Party correspondence school. 
Well, what kind of an education is that? Brezhnev. Some 
metallurgical night institute, some technical college, again 
neither one thing nor the other. So all Russia's rulers have 
lacked a classical education. Even Ulyanov [Lenin]. He was 
expelled from everywhere and eventually he passed his exams as 
an external student. That is no education. These are students 
that nobody wants. He was graded, then he went abroad and 
practically never lived in the country. That is the whole 
problem. There was Nicholas, who was simply tired. The last of 
the Romanov dynasty. To rule a state for 300 years! Naturally 
they were tired and could do no more. The people who took their 
place were totally unprepared for this and had no grounding in 
the classics. They rose as somebody's favorites, did their 
dirty work, and died. Terror, arbitrariness, perestroyka, 
Khrushchev's "spring," the thaw, stagnation, the Andropov 
regime.... It was all temporary, temporary, temporary.... All 
that linked them was the party, that political organization. 
But it too collapsed because it was rotting since it had no 
competitors or firm base within society because of its personnel 
approach. People hated communists because all the leaders were 
communists. Any communist worker would work like a nonparty 
person. A communist kolkhoz member would work just like a 
nonparty kolkhoz member. A nonparty lecturer would teach just 
like a communist lecturer. But the hatred arose because all the 
leaders in the country, from the team leader on a construction 
project to ministers, were exclusively CPSU members. So every 
shortcoming was linked with the party. The bribes, the failures 
in the economy, the failure to keep promises, the failures in 
foreign policy, the various clashes and conflicts -- everything 
was linked with it, with the party. Wherever someone turned 
with any problem, everywhere he would run up against a 
communist. Communists were everywhere, so to speak. So slight 
anticommunism ripened in people's minds even before perestroyka. 
During the period of perestroyka, when they began to preach 
anticommunism at the top, this became a current, a sickness, an 
ideology and took hold of the minds of millions of people. It 
is now difficult for the new communists to succeed, very 
difficult. Anticommunism is firmly established in the minds of 
millions of potential voters. This helped me to form a 
foundation. I did not become a fierce anticommunist. So I did 
not find myself among the dissidents. I was not jailed, I was 
not thrown into a mental hospital, I was not forced to leave. I 
was not talented enough to write something or make something 
that could be banned, not put on show, or not publicized. So I 
did not experience harassment by the authorities. There was 
some slight pressure with regard to my career. I could not work 
where I wanted to, I could not fill the post I wanted to. But 
all these negative experiences, brick by brick, formed the 
foundation and, when certain external conditions were created, 
this combined with my accumulated inner positive potential for 
political activity. 
  At 30, having reached the age of maturity, I wanted to 
really 
engage in politics and to be in some new political party without 
fail, I dreamed that this party would have its own deputies in 
parliament when it became a multiparty parliament, and I dreamed 
of heading the parliamentary opposition, my party's faction in 
parliament. Maybe in the long term of getting a ministerial 
post. I had thought about high posts before as well, but this 
was not any kind of an obsession with me or a soldier's dream of 
becoming a general. It was just that I saw these people, their 
entourage, their inability to lead the country. I realized that 
these dull-witted, sometimes simply stupid people reached the 
heights merely thanks to the system that allowed them to do so. 
Under a multiparty system I was sure, talented people would have 
more opportunities to pursue their own political career. So I 
did not set the aim of necessarily becoming president. I had an 
initial aim -- to create or join a new political party, to get 
into parliament, and to act within the framework of the faction 
of the political party thanks to which I had gotten into 
parliament in order to uphold my party's ideas there, work to 
increase its prestige, and ensure that it became the ruling 
party. 
  For me as an individual there was never any fanaticism 
about necessarily reaching any particular height. But there 
probably was fanaticism about implementing the goal, the idea 
whose supporter I had become. This also finds expression in 
ensuring that we all begin to live well in our country. Because 
when I was not able to work where I wished, this may have 
humiliated and aggrieved me, but I never dreamed of taking 
revenge on anyone because I had not been allowed to become a 
diplomat and had not been given the opportunity to work in the 
Foreign Ministry or other prestigious institutions. I was 
prepared to find my niche in another sphere and to make use of 
my potential. 
  But even in early childhood something dawned on me. It was a 
kind of ultimate idea which was like the intellect governing the 
world. Even when I was a small boy walking along the quiet 
street from home toward the Nikolskaya church and Nikolskiy 
market, there was something -- even then, as a barefoot boy, 
thoughts of something great were hovering in my head. At that 
time I could not grasp this in specific terms. But even then I 
intuitively foresaw that I was obviously destined for big-league 
politics. And this came to pass. This was no accident. 
Occasionally some of my opponents say: Where did he come from, 
we never knew him, we were stuck in jail, we were in the CPSU, 
we were abroad, but where did he pop up from all of a sudden? 
He wasn't in jail, or in the CPSU, or in a mental hospital, or 
abroad, he was not part of the galaxy of people who were 
expelled or exiled and whose works were not printed. This has 
evoked wariness, even bitterness, and mistrust. And envy, of 
course. An educated man with two university degrees who speaks 
European languages -- where did he pop up from, this throwback 
to the prosperous Russia of the last century. The rest felt 
themselves to be misfits, proletarians, members of the unknown 
and unrecognized intelligentsia.... I have naturally occupied a 
special niche in the Russian political arena in the last few 
years. But this followed organically from my previous life. 
  My subsequent career was this: After the army I worked in 
the Committee for the Defense of Peace, in the international 
relations section. There happened to be a vacancy for a 
consultant who knew French, which was not a very popular 
language in Moscow, so I turned up, having only just finished my 
service in the army, in political organs. I was hired. At the 
time I was still a Komsomol member. I think I was very lucky, 
despite everything there has been some luck in my life. After 
all, there might have been a vacancy for a consultant on Africa. 
  I did a lot of work with delegations from Western countries 
-- France, Belgium, Switzerland, Italy, and a number of other 
countries. I took part in holding the congress of peace 
supporters in Moscow in October 1973 and the World Congress of 
Youth and Students, which was held in Berlin that same year, in 
the summer, I think. I plunged into real political life, with 
the broadest contacts. Even when I was studying at the 
Institute of Asian and African Countries, I worked as a 
translator with various delegations via the Writers Union and 
other organizations. I had very frequent contacts with 
foreigners, a lot of foreigners studied at our university on the 
Lenin Hills. At the time in the student residence I very much 
wanted to share a room or at least an apartment with a 
Frenchman, but for a year I had to share with a Mongolian. The 
student department once told me to share an apartment with an 
Italian, but for some reason I thought that I would not need 
Italian and I refused. I was probably wrong to do so -- 
knowledge of Italian would perhaps have come in useful for me 
now. Nevertheless, I wanted to use even sharing an apartment 
with a foreign student in order to improve my linguistic 
knowledge. Thus, the foreign element in my life was a constant 
presence, and I was surrounded from childhood by representatives 
of different peoples. So the following was a concept close to 
my heart: There are different cultures, different 
civilizations, different mentalities. I could not be an 
isolated chauvinist wearing national blinders. I am in favor of 
the broadest development -- the most important thing is that 
there be no enmity, no dominance by any one nation, no 
discrimination. This consciousness developed gradually. I 
studied South Kazakhstan, Central Asia, then the whole of Russia 
and Moscow. I worked abroad, I had contacts with foreign 
delegations from Western Europe and America, I helped prepare 
international congresses -- and eventually my planetary world 
outlook began to emerge: We are all citizens of the same planet. 
  I had frequent contacts with an organization like World 
Federalists, which even at that time, 30-50 years ago, began to 
preach the idea of the all-European home. And Dr. Max Khabbit 
[surname as transliterated], a Swiss lawyer who was a candidate 
for the post of president of the Swiss Confederation, was a good 
acquaintance of mine, we had a lot of contact. He invited me to 
visit him, but at that time it was very difficult to visit a 
nonrelative in a capitalist country. So our contacts were 
mostly limited to him coming here. He visited Moscow several 
times and gave me his literature. 
  In the army my work was also connected with foreign affairs, 
and I studied the Near East and at the same time the West and 
other regions. My subsequent work also made it possible one way 
or another to have contact with foreigners. Even at the "Mir" 
Publishing House, where I worked for the last few years before I 
quit for big-league politics, there were foreigners and I had to 
conclude contracts with foreign firms. All this helped to 
ensure that I studied foreign experience a great deal at work. 
So my entire labor activity helped ultimately to develop my 
world outlook and inner concept. Knowledge of economics, for 
instance. "Mir" was a major publishing house. It encompassed 
production, culture, ideology, and legal work -- all spheres. I 
know economics not from textbooks but from practical experience 
-- plants, agricultural enterprises, work in various 
institutions, business trips. 
  I was lucky, I traveled the whole country from Izmail to 
Chukotka. I would go on leave by air. I have long known our 
whole country. It comes as no revelation to me what people live 
in what region in our country, what their religion, way of life, 
and problems are, and so forth. I am very familiar with all 
this, I have seen it all. I have often talked with people on 
trains and chatted on aircraft. Everything I had accumulated by 
the age of 45 can be described as experience of life and a 
degree of worldly wisdom, and I am not bragging here. After 
all, some 25-year-old boys regard themselves as politicians 
because they have read a few slender theoretical books. But a 
young man who has graduated from a medical institute is not yet 
a surgeon. It takes time for him to gain experience. This is 
especially necessary for a politician. You get talented surgeons 
even of 30. And 28-year-old physicists and doctors of sciences. 
But it is very difficult for a politician to show his mettle in 
every respect at a young age, because you have to have knowledge 
of life. You cannot skip this stage, at the age of 28 or 29 you 
cannot travel everywhere, learn everything, and have an 
all-around education. All this is difficult, it takes years and 
years. Maturity arrives somewhere around the age of 40. The 
time of wisdom begins, and a person is now capable of making 
decisions and answering for them. After all, it is one thing to 
be a political scientist studying politics as a science, as a 
subject. It is a different matter to be an active politician 
capable of making a decision. 
  Two years ago I took part in a roundtable at the "Nauka" 
Publishing House. At the end of the session the moderator asked 
the representatives of other parties (there were several of them 
there): Are you ready to form a government right now? They 
were dismayed. They said: No, we need to hold consultations, 
we need to give it some thought. But when they turned to me, I 
replied: Yes, we're ready. That is also the difference. You 
can describe yourself as a political party but not take part in 
elections and not be able or ready to put forward your candidate 
for deputy in a local representative organ or at some higher 
level, let alone a candidate for president. 
  Elections were held for the president of Russia. No party 
put forward its candidate. Yet there are 43 parties in the 
country today. And around 100 different movements and 
organizations. But there were not 40 candidates for president. 
There was just one candidate from a political party -- myself. 
Many may regard themselves as politicians, but they will be 
dilettantes. It's the same with sport. Little kids play soccer 
in every back yard, especially in the countryside. But they 
cannot call themselves footballers and high-class sportsmen. 
You get pilots of different levels, too. You get pilots of 
agricultural crop-sprayers, and pilot-cosmonauts. Some go into 
space, others fly at a height of 300 meters and spray 
pesticides. Both perform a necessary job, but the level of the 
job is different. It's the same in medicine. There is the nurse 
who hands the surgeon the instruments, but it is the leading 
surgeon who stands at the operating table. He's the one who 
saves the patient. Although the nurse who hands him the 
instruments is also necessary. Like the one who sterilizes the 
instruments, and the ones who prepare the patient for the 
operation. But they have different levels of knowledge. In 
politics situations sometimes arise where you have to save a 
country, you have to make decisions on that level. 
  Take Gorbachev in Foros in August 1991. He could have 
acted differently. Everything depended on him alone. And 
events would have developed quite differently. Because a 
statesman, a politician who considers the possibility of 
occupying top state posts, that is an exceptional, special 
sphere of labor activity. You cannot be just an average worker 
here. You can be an ordinary engineer, doctor, or coach. But 
politics, which involves the lives of millions of people, is the 
most responsible of jobs. You could not think up anything more 
responsible. Even the defense minister has less responsibility. 
He only has the armed forces. But here you have the whole 
country. And sometimes the whole planet. Because a great 
thermonuclear power like Russia, or America, or China, means 
making decisions on a planetary scale. This is no task for 
lightweights. Many young people are trying to create parties 
today, but these are fly-by-night parties, parties as a fashion. 
"I've got a party. I'm the party leader. We publish our own 
newspaper. We hold a congress. We demand that so-and-so 
resign, that so-and-so be punished...." That is merely playing 
at politics, and it is coming to an end. That is scum that will 
pass. Any world country is left with five or six parties that 
make up the political spectrum. But 40, 50, or 100 parties will 
not exist for long, of course. We need time now. After all, 
people want to express themselves, especially in our country, 
where for there was a single-party regime for so long. 
Naturally after such a single-party regime, there will be a 
very, very multiparty regime. But eventually, everything will be 
reduced to a three-, four-, or five-party system. That is 
sufficient to express the basic political views of the 
population and groups of voters. 
  I think that to engage in politics is useful, noble, and 
dangerous all at once, like any other profession. But education 
is essential here. Essential. When I read the biographies of 
the leaders of some of Russia's political parties, I often find 
category five electrician, or chess player, or writer, or 
biologist.... This always astonishes me. How can you engage in 
politics when you have such a narrow base of knowledge? You 
need extremely broad horizons here. You need knowledge of 
philosophy, history, philology, literature, sociology, 
jurisprudence, political science -- the broadest spectrum. You 
need to be a bit of a journalist, writer, leader, and orator, to 
know foreign languages, and to have a grasp of economic 
problems, ecology, child-raising, the activity of law 
enforcement bodies, and state security. The army, young people, 
sports, art -- you have to study a great many problems. A 
writer is free to write about anything, but he can avoid 
touching on a topic where his knowledge is poor. A political 
leader has to have knowledge in all spheres. You can't be a 
lathe operator one day and a party leader the next. He knows 
all about it now, he says: We will have a Russian republic, and 
that's that. We will have nothing. And this party, too, will 
soon cease to exist. But it is everybody's right to proclaim 
their own party and to believe that they are capable even of 
heading the government. There's nothing to be done. I greatly 
respect them. Viktor Ivanovich Korchagin, Barkashov, the writer 
Limonov, and a number of other figures are also trying to head 
political groupings. But it would be better for each person to 
mind his own business. Russia has very often been run by 
technical specialists. Almost all of them went to technical 
higher educational establishments. Some to agricultural 
institutes, some to trade institutes. But there have been 
almost no people in the country's leadership with an education 
in the humanities, still less a double one. And there have 
never been people in the leadership with a fluent knowledge of 
European languages and experience of foreign countries before 
they have come to power. There are even fewer people with a good 
knowledge of their own country. They would not have discovered 
it even if they had had 60 years. 
  Politics. You need to have a lot of free time for this. And 
a father with a lot of children will naturally be unable to go 
in for this because he has to devote all his emotional and 
physical efforts to his family. I have never been deeply in 
love with my wife. Our personal relationship has been OK, but 
we have not been head over heels in love. So I have been able 
to conserve my strength for politics. The same goes for my 
attitude toward my son. At one time during the earliest stages, 
I felt more affectionate toward him. But now that he is over 
20, all this has, in practice, become very moderate and 
extremely calm. So I have plenty of time, which is taken up by 
political activity. 
  I have to read a huge quantity of all sorts of newspapers, 
the programs of various parties, leaflets, proclamations, 
religious and philosophical literature, economic and historical 
literature, memoirs, and literature on geography and the most 
diverse fields of knowledge -- sociology, the armed forces, 
foreign countries, foreign parties. Twenty years ago I wrote a 
monograph entitled "Turkey's Political Parties." So I have been 
studying the systematization of parties for many years. I have 
given very long thought to the machinery of state power: What 
does it consist of? What are the components of the machinery of 
state power? How are society and the state administered? You 
cannot come to grips with this if yesterday you were a physicist 
in a laboratory or a biologist but today you are beginning to 
think about the state and about how to govern. This takes a 
decade, it takes a certain state intellect, part of your brain 
has to be tuned in to this. You have to train for decades, 
decades. You have to think about this, analyze, and compare. 
Stalin died, and there was the population's reaction to the 
death of Stalin. Then Khrushchev came along. They got rid of 
Khrushchev. Then Brezhnev was general secretary, then they 
removed Podgornyy. Then Kulakov died. Then Andropov appeared. 
Chernenko. Gorbachev. Yeltsin. I experienced, mulled over, 
and analyzed all these stages. And arrived at an understanding 
of the deep-seated processes of political life and state turning 
points. 
  I have a huge layer of political experience on the basis of 
practical life. You cannot get this from textbooks. You 
cannot, for instance, study the history of France, go there, and 
begin to engage in politics there. A journalist can go to some 
leader and interview him. But you can engage in practical 
political activity only in your own country, provided that you 
have accumulated a huge wealth of knowledge. So for me politics 
has not been something unknown and mysterious. I have always 
wanted to go in for this. Any narrow field depressed me. An 
orientalist studies only the East. A lawyer studies only the 
many branches of law. Only criminal law or only civil law -- 
that's boring. All in all, to be a lawyer is also very narrow. 
Or take economics. Nothing but taxes, circulating capital, 
money, immovable property -- all this is associated with a 
single narrow specialism. But the desire to embrace everything 
means that you develop a philosophical attitude toward life, you 
begin to understand what the theory of knowledge of life really 
is. I studied at an orientalist higher educational 
establishment, and I remember that in second or third year I 
wrote some course work for the philosophy department. 
Unfortunately, this was forbidden, you were supposed to write 
only for the department you were attached to. But I was drawn 
to philosophy, to broad knowledge of life and to the laws of 
dialectics, to understanding matter, spirit, and so forth. I 
might perhaps have studied at the faculty of political science, 
but at the time there was none. They had them in the Sorbonne 
and in London, but in our country you would have had to combine 
the faculties of history, philosophy, economics, and law, or our 
Institute of Asian and African Countries and a sociological 
institute. Then maybe out of six faculties you would produce a 
faculty of political science. But I had to study lots of 
unnecessary subjects. It would have been ideal if I could 
simply have graduated from the Moscow State University Faculty 
of Political Science. Then I could have gone into practical 
politics from the age of 23. But the conditions for this did 
not exist, there was no opportunity to acquire such an education 
straightaway, and it was impossible to immediately enter 
politics in view of the specific nature of the regime in our 
country before 1985. 
  That's not all. I simply did not want to go in for politics. 
I had already begun to develop my own geopolitical concept. I 
don't want to give it my name, the Zhirinovskiy formula, say, 
but the last "dash" to the south and Russia's outlet to the 
shores of the Indian Ocean and Mediterranean Sea are really the 
task of saving the Russian nation. For when the other parties 
talk about cutting off Kazakhstan, Kirghizia [Kyrgyzstan], and 
Central Asia, they do not realize that we are pushing Russian 
into the tundra, where mineral resources are all that can exist, 
where nothing can live and develop. The development of 
civilization has always begun in the south. People moved to the 
north because there were a great many of them, they had 
accumulated in the south, and movement developed in various 
directions, but people did not yet realize that they were 
leaving the best places. They left in a quest for food. And 
today we may quite unnecessarily drive ourselves into unviable 
regions and destroy the nation once and for all. 
  So the idea emerged of the last "dash" -- last because it 
will probably be the last repartition of the world and it must 
be carried out in a state of shock therapy, suddenly, swiftly, 
and effectively. This immediately solves all the problems, 
because we gain tranquility. We gain a four-zone platform. 
When we can rest on the Arctic Ocean in the north, the Pacific 
Ocean in the east, and the Atlantic via the Black, 
Mediterranean, and Baltic Seas, and, finally, when we can rest 
on the shores of the Indian Ocean in the south like a huge 
pillar, we will also gain tranquil neighbors. Friendly India. 
Enmity will cease forever. The quiet and tranquil 
Russian-Indian border. We will have to make the Russian-Chinese 
border like that too, and with the Japanese we have a maritime 
border. There is only sea there, and it must not be hostile. 
We have made ourselves secure [past tense as published] once 
and for all from the viewpoint of borders by creating a 
situation in which dismemberment or the removal of any parts is 
impossible because we will have abandoned the principle of 
ethnic division and the principle of division will be purely 
territorial inside the country -- guberniyas, oblasts, 
provinces, uezds, whatever you like. Without any ethnic tinge. 
The blending of peoples as a result of the economy, the 
dominance of the Russian language and the Russian ruble, and the 
dominant position of the Russian Army as the most 
combat-capable, this is a historical fact. We must ensure 
stability throughout our region for Russia and for the world 
community as a whole. This is historically natural, it is not 
an invention, not a fantasy. It is a reality. We stand on the 
south, but it is unstable, it is ablaze, it is in revolt. 
Because the tribes are again pressing from the rear. The 
Tajiks are under pressure from the Afghan tribes, the Turkmens 
from the Iranian tribes, North Azerbaijan from South Azerbaijan. 
Armenia is being squeezed by Azerbaijan from one direction. 
Georgia is being squeezed by Ossetia and Abkhazia. All this is 
unstable. They are all in a state of open warfare and 
hostility. And since these peoples have often fought, they now 
have a blood feud, they can no longer calm down, they will 
always fight. 
  But mankind cannot allow constant war in the south of 
Russia. 
In the Caucasus, Central Asia, and the Near East. The world is 
tired of aircraft taking off, missiles being launched, things 
exploding. We must quiet things down in this spot on the globe. 
There was the mighty conflict in Southeast Asia, Vietnam, Laos. 
Cambodia.... Both the Americans and we were involved. And I 
said: This war will end eventually. But the war in the Near 
East will not end and may ultimately trigger World War III. So 
Russia's last "dash" to the south will also preclude World War 
III. It is not only the solution to Russia's internal problem 
and the pacification of the peoples of this region, from Kabul 
to Istanbul. It is also the resolution of a global task, of 
planetary significance. America too will have tranquillity 
because wars have ended in this region and there are no Red, or 
Muslim, or Turkic, or Islamic fundamentalist threats. Tasks of 
geopolitical significance will be resolved. 
  The last "dash" to the south. I dream of Russian soldiers 
washing their boots in the warm waters of the Indian Ocean and 
switching to summer uniform forever. Lightweight boots, 
lightweight trousers, short-sleeved open-necked shirts with no 
tie, lightweight caps. And a small modern Russian assault rifle 
produced by the Izhevsk plant. These assault rifles are much 
better than UZI's. So any platoon of Russian soldiers can 
impose order anywhere. And, even better, so that there is no 
need for this. We must pacify this region forever. So that 
there are vacation centers, youth camps, sanatoriums, and 
preventive treatment centers there on the shores of the Indian 
Ocean and Mediterranean Sea. Huge areas could be opened up for 
vacations. The whole south could become one big zone of 
sanatoriums and rest homes for the industrial north and for 
people of all nationalities. All. The single economy and 
single legal and political space would create favorable 
conditions for the development of all trades and for culture, 
education, life, and the family structure, as everyone wants. 
  Where there are compact Muslim populations, let them have 
their own customs and maybe even retain bigamy, let women there 
wear the veil, and let houses be divided into women's and men's 
halves. And some of the population will always live in the 
steppe, in the mountains, or in the desert; in tents, in 
mountain huts, in yurts [tents], leading a nomadic life. They 
will engage mainly in raising livestock. That is normal. And 
cities will develop. We don't want huge megalopolies. Let 
there be small towns where it is convenient to live. Let them 
all have water, sewerage, small plants and factories, the 
necessary infrastructure, transport, and communications. All 
this will become possible if we make this last "dash" to the 
south. We badly need this, it is medicine that we must take. 
  Medicine is not always sweet. Some people in Kabul, 
Tehran, and Ankara may not like this. But millions of people 
will feel better as a result. Take Tajikistan today, for 
instance -- it is all ablaze. There are gunmen all around, 
people are fleeing abroad, some people are refugees inside the 
country. People are starving and dying. Is this better than a 
mighty power that will prevent the emergence of strongarm 
solutions to any questions? Human lives must be saved. You 
cannot experience democracy when you are wallowing in blood, 
when there is robbing and killing, when 6-year-old girls are 
being raped. Children's souls are being traumatized, they are 
losing, perhaps forever, the desire to live, and they are 
already mentally scarred, special homes should already be being 
built for them, otherwise they will be unable to live, they will 
die. After all, not only are there killings, but mental scars 
are also being inflicted which make part of the population 
practically unable to function. A mine is being planted for the 
future. Huge sums of money will be required to treat the 
front-line population that has experienced the new war. The 
territory from Leselidze to Dushanbe is all covered in corpses. 
Sukhumi, Ochamchira, Nagorno-Karabakh, Fergana, Dushanbe. It 
is all covered in blood and corpses, entire families, entire 
peoples are being butchered. Uzbekistan decided to expel the 
Turks, just think, the Turks, what kind of a people are they? 
They threw out 30,000 in a few days. Now they will want to 
slaughter the Koreans, they will say: Why do we want Koreans 
here? This is Uzbekistan, this is no place for Koreans. It is 
terrible. 
  So we must ensure that in the future there are no conflicts 
costing the lives of millions of people. We fear natural 
disasters -- the earthquake in Spitak or the floods in India. 
Hurricanes sweep across America. But surely the elemental 
political forces artificially created by certain political 
forces which want to express themselves in this way are equally 
terrible? Radicals, both left and right, want to change things 
fundamentally, forgetting that you cannot abruptly change human 
nature. So any radical elements, any extremists spoil the 
situation. Hitler was an extremist, Bonaparte was an extremist, 
even Peter I was in some respects an extremist. Russia has 
mostly taken part in multilateral wars, won victories, and 
received territories and advantages for itself as compensation 
for taking part. But the fanaticism, radicalism, and extremism 
characteristic of certain historical figures have led to world 
cataclysms. So we need to mold a consciousness among people and 
create institutions of power precluding obscurantism, whereby an 
entire region is covered in blood. We must preclude situations 
where all issues are decided by force of arms. Whoever has more 
assault rifles and bullets gets power. And thereby passes 
judgment. But on whom? On his own citizens. So if you come 
from Kurgan-Tyube and you have more assault rifles, you will 
beat the people of Kulyab who have fewer rifles. What is this 
-- a children's game: Who has more stones? This is barbarism, 
it is monstrous. And this too is politics. 
  Disasters for Russia have always and will always come from 
the south. All corruption began in the south, when Stalin 
created favorable conditions for his native Georgia. This 
despot ruled Russia for 30 years. And during this time Georgia 
was perverted and infected with corruption, which spread to 
Armenia and Azerbaijan. Then this filth spread to the East, to 
Central Asia, and crept upward, and eventually enveloped the 
entire country. The rulers did not understand this after the 
death of Stalin. At least he had a definite aim. He paid due 
tribute to his own nationality. He realized that the whole 
country might have a bad time, but at least the Georgians would 
have a good time. After his death this trend persisted under 
Khrushchev. The denunciation of the personality cult aggrieved 
Georgians, so once again Georgia was given a let-off. It ended 
in the destruction of the entire country. Maybe Georgia was a 
country that should not have been admitted to the Russian 
empire. And today Turkey would be our neighbor. It would be 
much less troublesome for us to trade with Turkey than it is 
now, when there is this bleeding wound -- Georgia -- between us. 
Georgia is in our way. We need a different border. We should 
either emerge onto the shores of the Pacific and Indian Oceans, 
or cut the south off from us behind a "Great Wall of China." 
But in the latter case our trade ties with Iran and Turkey and 
with Afghanistan would deteriorate. This would make us poorer. 
We clearly cannot countenance this. So there is only one 
option. We must carry out this operation, code-named the "last 
dash to the south." 
  Our Army will perform this task. This will be a method of 
ensuring the survival of the nation as a whole, it will be the 
basis for the renaissance of the Russian Army. New armed forces 
can be reborn only as a result of a combat operation. The Army 
cannot grow stronger in military commissariats and barracks. It 
needs a goal, a task. Just as when there was the task of 
repelling the threat of German occupation, Red regiments and 
divisions emerged to combat the foreign invaders. That was how 
the strong Red Army arose. Today the Russian Army is bound to 
undergo a renaissance if it puts a stop to the gunmen in Central 
Asia, the Caucasus, and Moldavia [Moldova] and carries out an 
operation to establish new Russian borders in the southern 
salient. All this provides a stimulus for the development of 
the economy, transport, and communications and for obtaining raw 
materials for food and light industry, cheap manpower, the 
opportunity to construct new main railroads -- in Delhi, Tehran, 
and Baghdad -- new air routes and highways. We need to restore 
the great silk road from China and India to Europe. It will 
pass through Russia, and Russia will grow rich. Our plants will 
always have enough manpower in the north and in Siberia because 
the population will migrate from south to north in a quest for 
work. Unfortunately, some of the population will die because 
the south does not currently have sufficient medicines and a 
sufficient level of culture. So natural survival, assimilation, 
and adaptation will take place. This is a natural process. But 
the economy will become healthy because the industrial north 
will supply all the necessary products for the south, and food 
and light industry will traditionally develop in the south. 
This kind of exchange of products, this kind of sensible 
combination will make it possible for everybody to lead 
confident and secure lives. 
  Last "Dash" to the South.... 
  There was Bonaparte's march across the whole of Europe to 
Russia, there was the march of Charles XII at the head of 
Swedish forces far to the south, down to the Black Sea, there 
was Hitler's march far to the east. And now there is the 
attempt by the Americans to influence all regions of the world 
-- in Japan, the Philippines, Panama, Africa, and Greece. So 
far the Americans have managed to dominate all over the planet. 
But the idea of world domination is fallacious. Regional 
cooperation is better. The division of spheres of influence is 
better; according to the north-south principle. If we intersect 
again, we will again be in one another's way. We must reach 
agreement, and let it be a world treaty to the effect that we 
divide up the whole planet and spheres of economic influence and 
operate in the north-south direction. The Japanese and Chinese 
can go south into Southeast Asia, the Philippines, Indonesia, 
and Australia. Russian can go south into Afghanistan, Iran, and 
Turkey. West Europe can go south into the African continent. 
Finally, Canada and the United States can go south -- the whole 
of Latin America. This is all on equal terms. No one has any 
advantages here. The direction is the same -- southward. The 
territories are contiguous. Vietnam and Malaysia are much 
closer to Japan and China than to us. Or, Afghanistan, Iran, 
and Turkey directly adjoin Russia, not France and Britain. The 
African continent borders Europe across the Mediterranean. And 
Latin America forms practically a single whole with the United 
States. 
  So allocation according to this geopolitical formula would 
be 
very favorable for all mankind. Warm, clear weather would be 
established over the entire planet. Cloudless weather, without 
hurricanes and storms. There would be less expenditure on 
energy, transportation, and communications. After all, the 
Japanese, for instance, ship their goods virtually all over the 
planet, and they could reduce these shipments by opening up our 
Far East and looking to China, Australia, and the Philippines. 
We would concentrate our economic ties mainly on Afghanistan, 
Iran, and Turkey for as long as these countries exist and are 
not drawn into Russia's orbit, becoming a component part of the 
Russian state. And Europe would trade successfully with Africa. 
Especially as France and Britain have colonies there and old 
connections. Both world order in general and economic order -- 
via external ties -- would be established. We would also save 
the planet environmentally. There would be fewer aircraft 
flying around. After all, they now fly from Istambul to Africa, 
but they could fly mostly here, to the north, and get what they 
need here. The number of regions would decrease. And fewer 
aircraft would fly from Russia to take goods to Africa. The 
refocusing of contacts and ties on the nearby region, on 
neighbors, would be cheaper and would require less energy. We 
would make it easier for people to exist on the planet. 
  And there would be no need to scatter the army. The 
Russian Army was in Angola, Mozambique, Ethiopia, Cuba, 
Nicaragua, and Vietnam. But this is pointless, it is too far 
away, it is too expensive. Our Army would be only on Russia's 
territory, on the shore of the Indian Ocean and Mediterranean 
Sea -- no further afield. Further down there is friendly Iraq. 
So everything would be reduced, space would be freed up, and 
the energy needed for the production of food and medicines and 
for leisure would be released. There would be fewer military 
bases because confrontation would decrease. What would be the 
point of America ringing Russia with bases or in our submarines 
sailing around Hudson Bay off American shores? It is more 
advantageous for us to concentrate our efforts here in the 
south. The Persian Gulf, the Mediterranean Sea -- everything 
immediately around Russia. And everybody else would act in a 
similar way. Looking a bit closer at hand, closer to home. 
  For instance, I have lived all over the country. But if I 
had lived in just one city, in Alma-Ata, I would have saved 
money. I would have a little orchard, I would have an apartment 
and acquaintances. But I have traveled all over the country, I 
have had to start over, I have expended tremendous effort, 
energy, and resources! So if we stayed put and acted locally, 
in the area around us and near to us, we would have better 
living conditions. All peoples seek this. So the idea of the 
last "dash" to the south is noble, it entails only positive 
consequences. However, despite everything, this is a method of 
treatment, and it is possible that someone may have a negative 
reaction. But this is a solution of world problems, and not 
everyone can be happy. 
  Today America is blockading Iraq, Libya, and Serbia. Are the 
peoples of these countries happy? But America believes it is 
acting correctly. And if we blockade Afghanistan, Iran, and 
Turkey, maybe some residents of these countries will be unhappy. 
But the world world must believe that if Russia has to do this, 
this is fine. You have to proceed from the will of the 
majority. It is to the advantage of the majority of mankind for 
the Muslim world to be cut up [rassechen]. The Muslim danger 
must be prevented. Other religions are incapable of leading to 
religious wars today. The Turkic-speaking world must be cut up. 
For only there is the task set of creating a Turkic state -- 
from Istanbul to Altay. Other countries have no such impulses 
to create a greater Ireland, a greater Nigeria, a greater 
Panama. Finally, Russia's southern borders are troubled, they 
perturb both Russia itself and the whole of Europe. From all 
viewpoints the last "dash" to the south, the Russian Army's 
campaign culminating in an outlet to the shores of the Indian 
Ocean and Mediterranean Sea, spells freedom for 20 million Kurds 
and hundreds of thousands of Baluchis, Pushtuns, Daris, and 
representatives of other peoples inhabiting the region. It 
means precluding the possibility of war between Iran and Iraq, 
between Iran and Turkey, between Afghanistan and Tajikistan, and 
between Pakistan and India. The hundreds of millions of people 
inhabiting this region will be able to avoid the bitter fate of 
refugees. Finally, we will prevent thermonuclear war, 
explosions at nuclear stations, and the mass extermination of 
people. And the death of huge numbers of people as a result of 
various epidemics spread all over the country at present. The 
pros of carrying out this operation considerably outweigh the 
cons which may naturally be perceived. And the Russian Army 
also needs this so that our guys can flex their muscle, tired as 
they are of "hazing," instead of sitting around in barracks, in 
the depths of Russia, waiting for the end of their term of 
service, not knowing where the enemy is, who the adversary is, 
or what they need to prepare themselves morally and physically 
for. This would be a cleansing for us all. And the peal of 
bells in Russian Orthodox churches on the shore of the Indian 
Ocean and Mediterranean Sea would proclaim peace to the region's 
peoples, fraternity to the peoples, prosperity, affluence, 
tranquillity, and an end to any military conflicts and 
interethnic clashes. It would be good for us all, because 
everybody would gain. The only one who might not like this is 
America, but it will not interfere. The other scenario for the 
development of events is too serious for it if it intervenes, 
there will be too many negative consequences if it impedes the 
establishment of Russia's southern borders. 
  Russia will only do what is foreordained and will fulfill 
the 
great historical mission -- liberate the world from wars, which 
always begin in the south. And this operation -- the last 
"dash" to the south -- is not the Barbarossa plan [Hitler's plan 
for the invasion of Russia], not Napoleon's plans, not the 
military ventures of Swedish King Charles XII. It is a purely 
Russian variant, it has been elaborated by Russia's very fate, 
otherwise Russia will be unable to develop and will perish and 
we will be crammed with nuclear stations and nuclear weapons 
which will eventually blow up and destroy the whole planet. We 
cannot allow this to happen. So everybody must agree that 
Russia must inevitably establish its own borders in a new 
region, and let Tajiks, Turkmens, and Uzbeks live freely there. 
But there must be no national entities there. 
  At one time in Central Asia, just 60 or 70 years ago, there 
was just Khiva, Urgench, Khorezm, Fergana, and Tashkent. There 
was no Uzbek SSR. The "children of different peoples" lived in 
these city-republics or city-khanates. And today let there 
again be a multitude of cities -- Bukhara, Khorezm, Tashkent, 
Urgench, Kabul, Dushanbe, Pyandzh, Pamir, Tehran, Tabriz. 
Different city-republics. Territorial units. Kurdistan with 
its capital in Diyarbakir, Armenia will restore its borders. 
The western borders of Armenia will debouch onto the shore of 
the Black Sea. Georgia will get the little bit of the Black Sea 
south of Batumi in order to compensate for its losses in 
Abkhazia. They will all get what they want. Okay, they will be 
a bit unhappy in Ankara. Okay, some people will be unhappy in 
Tehran and Kabul. But millions of people and the entire planet 
will receive a positive solution. Ultimately the Turks came to 
Istanbul from somewhere near Tashkent, and Tashkent remains a 
city to which they can return, it is their birthplace. Or they 
can stay where they are currently living. But the Kurds, 
Armenians, Baluchis, and hundreds of other peoples must not be 
oppressed. And how many Greeks, Bulgarians, and other Slavs are 
there in Istanbul? Why do they have to conceal their 
nationality? Why can't they use their own language? This will 
be a multilingual world. But of course from Constantinople to 
Kabul it will choose one language for communication, as they 
have done in the city of Sukhumi. There they have chosen not 
Georgian, not Abkhazian, not Greek, not Armenian, but the 
Russian language. It is easier for them all to speak Russian 
than to learn five languages. And throughout this new space 
extending to the shore of the Indian Ocean everybody will speak 
Russian. Dozens of different peoples of different religions, 
Turkic-speakers and Farsi-speakers, Slavs and Greeks, Kurds and 
Arabs. This will be a common motherland for all. But a 
motherland without wars, because the borders will be secure. 
The Indian Ocean, and further north the limitless expanses of 
Russia. And Russian Army garrisons, like beacons warning of the 
danger of resorting to arms. All questions will be resolved 
only by peaceful means. Everyone will do what they like. And 
pursue the way of life that is closest to them. 
  If we do not pacify [uspokoit] this region, disturbances, 
corruption, disease, and war will rise higher and engulf the 
whole of Russia. And then we will have the situation where 
someone had to cut off a finger to avoid gangrene, but refused 
to do so. And then he died because the gangrene affected his 
entire body. It's the same in the history of mankind. Maybe 
the rights of a small group of citizens have to be infringed, 
but even they fully retain both their lives and their way of 
life. And tranquility is established for millions of people and 
the danger that they will be exterminated or hurt in any way is 
precluded. You cannot govern by waving chocolate bars in 
the face of your subjects. Or only by brandishing a whip. 
  The main problem remains the nationalities problem. How can 
envy and competition between nations be allayed? How can 
everyone be made to realize that we are citizens. Citizens. 
Not Turks, not Persians, not Tajiks -- we are citizens. This 
is my home, I live here, I work here, my family is here. And I 
must not go and rob the house next door, kill the children in 
someone else's family, and have the right to rape anyone or 
engage in looting -- all this must be prohibited everywhere. No 
violence. But we will establish correct borders, we will create 
a stabilizing factor. It is like religion. After all, 
believers know you have the Russian Orthodox Church. You have 
the patriarch of all Russia. You have the supreme synod of the 
Russian church. You have the major cathedrals in Moscow. But 
what if none of this existed? Just crosses and bells would not 
attract this huge mass of Orthodox believers. It the same with 
the nationalities question. There has to be a mighty state 
around, and within the framework of this mighty state 
representatives of different nations and nationalities have to 
be afraid of each other and not even think of attacking each 
other. 
  Clashes between peoples must not be provoked. Take the 
events of February 1988 in Sumgait. Was this a natural action? 
For no apparent reason, all of a sudden students from a 
vocational and technical school get drunk, get some sticks, and 
go off to kill Armenians in the city? This was a considered 
action. Certain forces in the Transcaucasus had to create a 
seat of injustice. Communist ideology had been abandoned, and 
they wanted to replace it with a national ideology. But how 
could this be done if everybody took a calm, normal view of each 
other. How? Make the Azerbaijanis hate the Armenians. You 
have to create conflict. You have to create a small war. And 
they did this in Sumgait. There was carnage. People were 
burned alive. That is terrible. The same happened in Baku as 
well. An eyewitness from Baku told me how an old Armenian man 
was caught at the station and burned alive right there on the 
station square. And people helped do it. One old lady brought 
a mattress to make it easier to burn him, someone brought wood, 
branches, matches, and gasoline. They helped drag the old man 
there. They threw him on the heap, set fire to it, and stood 
there. People! At the end of the 20th century! They burned 
someone alive for being of a different nationality! It is 
monstrous. Can such things be allowed to happen? And all this 
is in order to revive a national ideology. To make Azerbaijanis 
hate Armenians. They are Azerbaijanis. There is an enemy -- 
the Armenians. The enemy must be fought. People must put up 
with these temporary difficulties, but defeat the enemy -- the 
Armenians. And then we will live happily ever after. It was on 
the basis of that formula that clashes began throughout the 
country. They found a "scapegoat" in Uzbekistan -- Meskhetian 
Turks. Uzbeks and Kirghiz clashed in the Osh valley of 
Kirghizia. Tajiks and Uzbeks clashed somewhere else. In this 
way it is possible to cause clashes between peoples throughout 
our country. Abkhazians and Georgians, Ingush and Ossetians, 
Kabardinians, Cherkessians, Adygeans -- hundreds of peoples. It 
is possible to provoke a fratricidal war that will be perpetual. 
War will go on forever. How easy it is to kill today.... 
  I have often returned to my childhood and youth, to the 
period of my army service, and to my friends. I have not been 
able to cover the entire period of my childhood. There were 
instances when I was insulted because I was not a physically 
strong boy, there are also some good memories, childish 
friendship in a Young Pioneer camp, for instance. I did 
excellently at university, I had certificates for participation 
in social work. I also had a certificate for taking part in 
preparing the Congress of Peaceloving Forces and taking part in 
preparing the World Festival of Youth. I was debarred from some 
things, I had no state awards, of course, I had no significant 
academic works either, or academic degree. Although after my 
first higher educational establishment, after graduating from 
the Institute of Asian and African Countries, which earlier was 
called the Institute of Oriental Languages, I was offered around 
five postgraduate opportunities. In both philology and 
philosophy -- I could have gone further in this direction. But 
I did not feel particularly drawn to science. You needed 
application, you needed to do a lot of work with literature. I 
was more attracted to the life that was really going on today -- 
outside the window of the building where I was, or outside the 
window of the trolleybus in which I was traveling. The living 
and the contemporary were what attracted me. And I wanted to 
deal with this. And with the same kind of politics -- real, 
living politics. This is why I took pleasure in creating a new 
political party and began to work vigorously in it. Many people 
were prepared to do the same, but this requires great efforts. 
After all, ultimately you have to quit your job. And if 
someone has a job they love, they find this difficult. The 
option I took was that at this time I was doing a job I 
disliked, and then I switched to doing something I loved, namely 
creating a political party and taking part in its work. 
  The most important thing is the opportunity not only to 
speak 
out, but also to attempt to propagandize your ideas. The most 
important thing is pluralism in everything. I would put it in a 
nutshell as follows. Pluralism in democracy, in resolving the 
nationalities question, and in the concept of ownership, the 
state, and the raising of children -- a multiplicity of views in 
everything. There cannot be a single line -- for instance, all 
children are educated in boarding schools, or everybody works in 
plants, or everybody serves in the army, or everybody studies 
Marxism. This totalitarian attitude is what I was sick of. But 
at the same time I am an advocate of tough measures in certain 
situations -- involving crime and attempts to dismember the 
state, smash the economy, and destroy certain structures. So 
there is a need to make a distinction: between being an 
advocate of a totalitarian regime or being an advocate of a 
democratic free regime under which some tough measures may be 
applied. For instance, this is simply essential today. 
Tajikistan. They are killing people at every corner. How can 
the violence be stopped by democratic means? Clearly, there is 
a need to apply strong-arm measures here. Thus in creating a 
party I can express my ideas and attempt to ensure that these 
ideas are understood and taken to heart by many citizens in our 
country and to find as many supporters as possible. 
  The path to victory is the implementation of ideas via the 
victory of the party and its leader. This is all 
interconnected. Because your program can be finally really 
implemented when you have the opportunity to put it into effect, 
if the political force in question controls the levers of state. 
When you are in opposition you can express ideas as much as you 
like, but there is little likelihood that they will be put into 
effect unless you come to power. Although it is possible for 
the opposition to have a positive influence on ruling structures 
in the sense that a ruling party can borrow all its ideas from 
certain elements of them and put them into effect. So the role 
of an opposition party can have positive consequences all the 
same. So despite everything the very system of political 
parties means that the universal positive desire for prosperity 
finds a niche. 
  There are many parties in Russia today, over 40, and many 
social movements and groups. These parties and movements 
emerge, disintegrate, and join various alliances and coalitions 
-- this is a perfectly normal process. Although ultimately, of 
course, five or six leading parties will be left. But now there 
are a great many people who want to express themselves somehow. 
They are like hungry people. After all, a hungry person will 
fall upon any food. He wants more and more, as fast as 
possible. It's the same in political life. Under the one-party 
system everyone who did not join the CPSU experienced a sense of 
political hunger. They were totally cut off from political 
life. This is the trouble with the one-party system. The point 
is not just that communists formed the basis of the one-party 
system. In itself a one-party system is unviable. In those 
circumstances in general there is no need for any party, since 
there are no competitors and there is no opportunity for various 
political forces to take part in elections. 
  The one-party system exists as cover for dictatorship by a 
force in power, for there is a need to maintain an apparatus at 
local level that can be used somehow to influence the masses. 
That is why there is a need for a party. Clearly, this is 
necessary at a certain historical stage. But this was a 
one-party regime not in purely state interests, for the benefit 
of Russia as such -- it also had an ideological complexion. 
There was the idea of building communism, and also its spread 
beyond the country. This was the communists' second mistake. 
Okay, have a one-party regime only in our country and try to 
build communism, but what was the point in going further? 
Because if all the aid that was given to foreign countries had 
been left in the USSR, we would have been a very rich, highly 
developed, cultured country even under the one-party regime. 
Because even with all the flaws we have tremendous 
achievements. What if we had not had these flaws? The 
one-party regime is flawed in itself because there is no 
competition between ideas, competition between positions. They 
decided to implement the idea of communism here -- both here and 
abroad. All the efforts and resources were expended on this. 
In any case, you need a multiparty regime to ensure that there 
are no protracted experiments. If a party comes to power and 
for five years tries to squander resources, distributing them 
all over the world, it will lose the next elections, and this 
experiment will end. So, for all the pros and cons of both a 
one-party and a multiparty regime, the latter nevertheless comes 
out on top. Pluralism is better. It's better when there is a 
choice. 
  Here is a simple illustration from personal life. Imagine 
you get married at 25 and have no right ever to form any 
relationship with a woman. That you have got that woman for all 
time, until death do you part. Well, that's fine if there is 
deep, pure honest love on both sides. But what if there isn't? 
What if it has run dry? What if it was one-sided? What then? 
Are you supposed to lay down your life for the sake of the idea 
of just one marriage, just one woman? In reality this does not 
happen. In reality the overwhelming majority of men and women 
have several sexual partners in a lifetime. Even if they have 
only one marriage. It's the same in politics, only more so. 
It is undesirable to tie everybody to one party, to one 
idea, to one blueprint. That is deadening. Meanwhile, a 
multitude of ideas makes the country more luxuriant, like a 
bouquet of flowers. After all, a bouquet always looks brighter, 
more elegant, and more attractive than a single flower. 
Like an orchard. An orchard is beautiful when it contains 
different kinds of trees. Or take a birch forest -- you have to 
admit, it's tedious. Nothing but birches and birches, all those 
white trunks.... It's more attractive when you have mixed 
woodland. And when you have mixed weather too. Just imagine 
constant heat, with a temperature of 35-40 degrees. This 
exhausts and destroys people. Because you need spring, you need 
fall, rain, wind, chilly weather, overcast weather, sunshine -- 
all sorts. People need choice and a varied life in varied 
forms. It's just like a man's life. You have childhood, then 
the teenage years, youth, maturity, more advanced years, old 
age, and finally decrepitude and departure from life. Man 
experiences all this, he has 10 years of adolescence and 10 
years of youth. And each decade offers certain joys and some 
knowledge of life, offers its own methods of expression. All 
this has to exist in political life too. So that man can be 
free. 
  But in political life itself it is desirable to stick to one 
idea. It is good for this to be a family tradition -- voting 
for a political party. For instance, the entire family -- the 
grandfather, his son, his grandson -- they have always been 
supporters of the Liberal Democratic Party. And they 
traditionally vote for the LDPR [Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russia]. Another family supports the Social Democratic Party. 
A third is tied to the Christian Democrats, a fourth to the 
Constitutional Democrats, a fifth to the monarchists, and a 
sixth to some left-wing forces. It would be good if there was 
political education along with general education within the 
family itself. In this sphere too tastes can be established in 
childhood, when from infancy people see that their father is 
attached to a party, see that he constantly votes for that party 
and attends its events. And maybe is even a member of the 
party. This is a good tendency -- being a supporter of a single 
party -- but this all takes place within the context of a 
multiparty system, it's only when there are other parties that 
you can compare and rejoice at your party's victory. It's the 
same in sport -- there are lots of teams, but from an early age 
a youth may support "Spartak," for instance. He always supports 
this team, he likes it. Whether it loses or wins, he knows this 
team, its coach, and its players and follows its games. This is 
also an element in social life. Political life is part of our 
social life, here too people have their own tastes, their own 
views, their own habits. So there is a need for pluralism. 
There is a need for a multiparty system. 
  Just imagine that "Spartak" was the only team in sport. 
And everybody supported "Spartak." Nobody would support it, 
because they pick one sports team out of different ones, on the 
soccer field during matches they choose a powerful team or a 
classier one that plays more skillfully. But if there was just 
one team, it would simply have nobody to play. It simply would 
not exist, that team. What is the point of supporting "Spartak" 
if there are no matches? No soccer cup, no championship, no 
wins and losses, just the name: "Spartak." And its coach. 
Like the CPSU general secretary. He's the only one for 20 
years, and there will be no changes until he dies. So there 
always has to be pluralism. It is also necessary in personal 
life. In all spheres. But at the same time you need a certain 
focus and commitment to a single idea. A man may have an 
amorous nature, but you cannot get married every year because, 
clearly, society would not entirely understand this. But the 
Muslims' polygamy, which people sometimes take an ironical, 
skeptical view of, also has its good points. This could be a 
policy for solving the problem of prostitution, a way of 
combating loneliness, and a way of ensuring that all children 
have a father. And also a remedy against poverty because a 
Muslim with three or four wives tries to support them all and to 
maintain his family honor. This family is like a small tribe, a 
small clan, it has a big house and the children play. Everyone 
looks after each other. This too has its plus points. So you 
cannot reject everything. This too is a form of pluralism. And 
in some places, in northern Europe, say, marriages between men 
are permitted. These are two polar aspects of pluralism. Both 
may evoke hostility from the average European: polygamy among 
the Muslims and officially sanctioned marriage between men in 
Nordic Europe -- Britain, Sweden, Canada. But this is 
universal, planetary pluralism. 
  All peoples are made for particular forms of relations. In 
the Transcaucasus and in the East people, men included, kiss 
when they meet. In Russia for some reason it is not customary 
for two young men to go up to one another and kiss. But in 
Yerevan, Tbilisi, and Baku it is the norm. These are probably 
different manifestations of human relations and different forms 
of them. This too is pluralism. Although some customs and 
traditions may evoke misunderstanding. It's the same in 
politics -- in some places political opponents are killed, their 
cars are blown up, there are explosions in parliaments, 
terrorist acts are committed. And in some places the struggle 
proceeds calmly, the different positions of different parties 
are upheld in the most cultured of expressions, there is no 
malice, no violence in relations, there are no calls to stifle 
the opposition -- take France, the Netherlands, or Denmark. 
Pluralism is very widely developed in all spheres of human 
relations. 
  Of course, every party is to some extent reminiscent of a 
kind of political mafia gang, because it has a leader and it has 
certain internal laws. Sometimes there are people in the party 
leadership who are not always honest or scrupulous, not always 
noble, not always patriots, people who use power solely to get 
rich. Of course, there is a danger that in a given party people 
with base interests could seize the leadership, and that party 
could become the ruling party and gain the opportunity to put 
its base objectives into practice. Take the history of the 
Latin American countries, or again, Germany, Hitler and his 
party. The idea did not look as bad as all that -- the National 
Socialist Party of Germany. What is wrong with that? A 
socialist workers party. National, because it is for Germany's 
rebirth. But Hitler's ideology meant the party drifted, in the 
end, toward the extreme right sector -- the brown sector of 
political life. This led to violence. Yet at the first stage 
everything was relatively calm. Well, maybe the forms of 
combating opponents within the party and other rivals were too 
drastic. But ultimately the party turned into a repressive 
apparatus for the whole country. It rejected all opposition, 
and in effect stifled it. The leader's personal qualities 
played a part in this. Conversely, in France it was thanks to 
his personal qualities that Bonaparte was able for a prolonged 
period to make the French Army invincible, and that was possible 
specifically because of his personality. The same with the 
Russian Army. For instance, Bagration or the other generals 
could not have fulfilled Kutuzov's [Russian field marshal during 
Napoleanic war] role. Suvorov [18th century Russian field 
marshal], at one time, played a significant role. Personality 
always plays a role in history -- both highly positive and 
highly negative. Peter I. A great czar, big reforms. But the 
city of Petersburg is built, in effect, on the bones of peasant 
serfs. How many of them died that this palace city might arise 
amid the marshes? It is a palace today, but what was there 300 
years ago? And how was it built? The Baykal-Amur Railroad was 
built by prisoners and soldiers. Who now remembers 1974, 1975, 
1979? And how many people fled from there, how many accidents 
occurred? How many people's lives were ruined? 
  The role of personality and particular events are usually 
assessed more positively or, conversely, more negatively with 
the passage of time. Everyone applauded Stalin while he was 
alive. But now many people are repelled by what they have 
learned about those events. When Czar Nicholas [II] renounced 
the throne, Petersburg rejoiced. Everyone -- courtiers, 
workers, landowners, ministers, leaders of all parties -- 
everyone rejoiced. The end of the monarchy, the end of the 
autocracy! But 70 years have passed, and today monarchist 
parties are springing up in our country, today we are prepared 
to consider that the monarchy was a good thing for Russia. But 
back then, in February 1917, everyone greeted the czar's 
abdication with delight. Because they felt that the regime was 
rotten, that the czar could no longer govern, had been unable to 
govern for some years already. And his entourage could do 
nothing, either. I am sure that Mikhail, his brother, also 
would not have been able to rule for long. 
  Sometimes we return to certain events and try to assess them 
in a new way. But they should be assessed as they were at the 
time they happened. In February 1917 the czar renounced the 
throne virtually voluntarily, and the people received this 
positively, they did not take to the streets chanting the slogan 
"Restore the autocracy!" -- on the contrary, they rejoiced, they 
saw it as a revolution -- a peaceful, quiet revolution, a way of 
aligning themselves with the states of Europe that had also 
renounced their monarchies. It was a festival for Russia. But 
time passed, and now we think it was more or less a tragedy. 
History marches on, it cannot be deflected or turned back, you 
cannot keep reassessing things. It must be realized that, 
clearly, there are two ways of assessing every phenomenon. Czar 
Peter I was great by virtue of his victories, but there were 
also many sacrifices on the altar of those victories. Because 
the too rapid Europeanization of Russia had not only positive, 
but also negative consequences. The destruction of the 
traditions of the patriarchal Russian family -- that too had 
negative consequences. Drunkenness and absenteeism certainly 
date from those days, from Peter's time. And smoking, and other 
features of European life. So, in addition to civilization, 
Europe also brought to Russia a corrupting element. Say under 
Stalin's regime we were a closed country. That was also 
positive to some extent. For instance, with respect to the fact 
that we were almost completely free of venereal diseases. And 
morality in general was at a high level. I was at school from 
1953 to 1964, and all the girls in our class were virgins. And 
if any girl happened to give us reason to think that she had 
already embarked on a sex life, this was seen in very negative 
terms. At the age of 17 or 18 we guys were pure, with a 
well-balanced mentality, we did not have a drug addiction. We 
did not sniff anything, and as for alcohol, just a little, at 
home with our parents, on festive days. And nobody made any 
comments to us about whether we drank a lot or a little, it did 
not even enter our heads. Even the word "restaurant" was 
considered not quite nice, and people who went to such places 
were certainly seen as people with extremely bad characters. Of 
course, this was a provincial outlook, but there was a positive 
side to it. After all, in the majority of cases young people 
got married and the girl was a virgin. The young man, her 
husband, was her first man, and a marriage like that is 
stronger, it is a better foundation for future family life. 
  Every time has its pluses and minuses. And we should be 
conservatives, we should preserve what is good. There was 
something good in czarist Russia. There were merchants, there 
were courtiers, workers, civil servants, the police, the 
gendarmerie, the army. The territorial division, the insurance 
system, the system of medical services. All this should have 
been perfected. But we stopped it all, all that we could, we 
destroyed it and started again from zero. You should never 
start again from zero! Just imagine you have a family but no 
home, nothing, so you go out into the fields and start from 
zero. You will die. How can you build a house, where will you 
work, how will you live? Yet when it comes to the state, we 
have permitted ourselves, several times this century, to raze 
everything to the ground and start again from zero. On with the 
market economy! What is wrong with the administrative economy? 
It has drawbacks, but why destroy it? A huge number of plants 
and kolkhozes are working and producing output which we all 
need. So let us create different legal conditions for work. 
Let us give them the maximum degree of autonomy. Let us use 
the lease system as much as possible. But why destroy? That is 
a pernicious policy. But it happens, because the Mensheviks are 
in power. In 1917 the Bolsheviks came to power, in 1991 the 
Mensheviks -- they are all part of one and the same political 
party. The RSDRP [Russian Social Democratic Workers Party], or 
VKPb [All-Union Communist Party (Bolsheviks)], or RKPb [Russian 
Communist Party (Bolsheviks)], or RCP [Russian Communist Party], 
or CPSU. But it is still the same communist party. So the 
power factor continues. This should not happen! Maybe Russia's 
characteristic economic structure is one where the state sector 
accounts for 70-80 percent. Our private sector will be only 20 
percent. Why not proceed on that basis, why do we have to 
destroy the entire state sector, say "on with privatization!" 
and let us have only private ownership? We swing from one 
extreme to the other, for the umpteenth time in the 20th century. 
  Russia's golden age was the 19th century. Everything 
proceeded gradually. The Decembrists acted -- it did not work 
out; they went. Some of them were exiled to Siberia, some were 
executed. That is to say, a process was going on. In time 
serfdom was abolished, but this reform had not reached its 
conclusion when new reformers came along -- Alexander II, and 
then Witte and Stolypin. Russia was slowly gathering speed. By 
1913 we had achieved "4" for everything, in Europe-wide and even 
worldwide terms. Why do we destroy that "4"? We go "back to 
zero," and have difficulty rising as high as a "3." Why, when 
by 1940 we could have turned our "4" into a "4 plus"? But by 
1940 we were barely achieving "3 minus." Now, by 1991 we had "4 
minus" again. So let us achieve a "4," and, by the beginning of 
the century, "4 plus." But no -- we go back to the "zero 
option" and now we have "2 plus." Why does all this happen?! 
It is not only the economy that is ruined -- people are dying, 
all the time people are dying. A covert civil war is in 
progress, and in some regions it has become open. Like a 
disease. There are hidden forms, but the disease is still a 
disease. It saps the living organism. So it is with a covert 
civil war. In Tajikistan, in the Caucasus, it is open. In the 
Baltic region and Ukraine it is in its covert form. But it is 
happening, this civil war! It is destroying us from within. 
This is more dangerous. The war in Tajikistan now may actually 
be less dangerous. It will end, such wars end quickly. The 
acute form of the disease can be treated more easily and 
diagnosed more quickly, a favorable outcome is more likely. The 
covert form is like a fire. Something is burning somewhere, 
smoke is coming from underground, but we cannot find it. Like 
in a mine. The shale burns, or the coal -- it burns for years, 
and then it all comes out onto the surface, bursts out, and half 
a city is destroyed instantly. It is easier to put out a 
burning house, even if it is a very dangerous fire. 
  We need pluralism, we need openness, calm. Our Motherland 
must no longer be tormented, she is tired, we have worn her out 
with these name changes. The artificial name USSR, the still 
more artificial CIS. The state has its own name -- Russia. 
This is a historical name, it is a geographical concept. It 
does not by any means denote a state for Russians. It is the 
Eurasian continent. It is 22 million square kilometers. It is 
the Arctic Ocean which washes our northern borders; it is the 
Pacific Ocean in the Far East. It is the Atlantic, via the 
Black and Baltic Seas. And in the future the Indian Ocean, when 
we have accomplished our final "southern dash." 
  The state's own name is better than an artificial title. The 
land cannot be divided. National borders cannot be drawn in a 
state which existed 1,000 years ago. Just try and divide France 
once again into Gaul, Brittany, etc. Or let us divide Spain 
once again into the Basque Country, Catalonia, and Spain proper. 
After all, anything could be divided. Italy into Sicily and 
Northern Italy. Let us separate Corsica from France, let us 
take away its overseas territories. Let us divide up the whole 
world -- borders and customs posts. Does mankind really want 
this? We should calm down, we should realize: Only a single 
state, with the name of Russia, can exist. But without 
suppressing other ideas or particular population groups, without 
any kind of political diktat, without a monopoly in the economy 
or in culture. Pluralism, multiplicity in everything, diversity 
in everything. 
  Not everyone understands the word "pluralism," so it is 
better to use Russian words. Diversity instead of "pluralism." 
"Free prices" instead of "price liberalization." We have the 
words "private ownership." "Privatization" -- all it means is 
going over to private ownership. Why should we use so many 
foreign words? We have our own words. The dismantling of state 
ownership, that is, the switch to personal ownership, private 
ownership, ownership by the labor collective, etc. Or take 
"vouchers." Why do we need a grating foreign word? We could 
call them "checks" or "coupon for the purchase of ownership 
rights," or find some other name that might be shorter. Less of 
these foreign words. Of course, foreign words cannot be 
entirely avoided. There should be a single language that unites 
us. Esperanto is needed as a separate language, not in the form 
of the penetration of our own language by foreign words, so that 
it becomes virtually unrecognizable. Children now have to be 
given explanations, told what this or that non-Russian word 
means, while old people fail to understand whole sentences and 
words in television and radio broadcasts. 
  So politics is part of our life, and we encounter it every 
day. If a new person appears in this world, he is born in a 
maternity home, and the state looks after the new generation. 
Or an old man dies -- the cemetery or the morgue is one last 
contact with the state. A birth certificate is a state 
document, a death certificate is also a state document. Between 
these two documents, there are links with the state everywhere. 
You go to school -- you become part of the education system. 
You get married -- again, contact with a state institution. 
Even if it is a church wedding. Because the institution of the 
church exists within society, and society exists within the 
framework of some kind of state. For instance, ours is the 
Orthodox Church, not Lutheran or Protestant. Again, this has to 
do with the state in which we live. Our labor activity. 
"State-employer" relations. There are private enterprises, but 
one way or another everything is linked to the state. 
Insurance, for instance. Pensions -- again, state involvement. 
And so it is for every step we take. Traffic inspector, 
doctor, teacher, notary, apartment block manager, fitter, cab 
driver, pedestrian crossing, park, bar, bathhouse, train, 
customs house, border guards, plane. However hard we try to 
find a place to hide, we are always linked to the state 
institution in the society in which we live. 
  A tribe at the earliest stage of mankind's development did 
not have a state. Nature, the cave, an animal skin, a fire. 
People were part of nature. But at today's stage in mankind's 
development we constantly have cells of some kind that are 
connected with the structure of a given state system. And the 
regulation of relations is carried out, for the most part, 
through political parties. That is what mankind has devised. 
These are groups of people who adhere to a particular system of 
views on the state system. And sometimes they have very similar 
systems of views on the state system. Although there may be 
different party names, different leaders. This offers the 
opportunity to compete, not to merge into one big political 
group. People differ in their views, in temperament, and 
because of this we will always have many parties. If some 
dictatorial regime is in power, it bans certain political 
parties. But in general the way of life, the system of 
existence, in the sphere of politics is through the interaction 
of political parties. An artist may be a loner, and indeed not 
all countries have artists' unions. A writer may also be a 
loner. But he is still linked to the state. He needs a 
publisher, he needs a book distribution system, advertising, 
meetings with readers. Therefore he is still obliged to join 
certain corporations and link himself in some way to the state, 
to society. He may, of course, hide out somewhere in a dacha, 
for a year, or two, or three, and write his novel; but he needs 
paper, ink, information, other books, archives -- in the end he 
cannot cut himself off from the state. And the same is true of 
the system of political parties. Here we are linked, we are 
different, and through different parties we express our views, 
we seek the success of our party. These are the elements of 
political life. Successes, defeats, failures, ups and downs. 
As in personal life, as in production or working life, as in 
creative work, as for a sportsman or a scientist. There will 
always be some positive and some negative aspects. 
  But politics has its own peculiarities, its own internal 
laws, which also require clearly defined relations. A party 
needs an organization centrally and locally; it needs rules, 
fundamental documents, a program; periodical meetings, 
conferences, congresses, plenums, supreme councils. A party's 
activity takes the form of rallies, demonstrations, pickets, 
activity through the faction in parliament, the use of the 
press, all kinds of forms. Like sportsmen -- competitions, 
championships, the Olympic Games, training sessions, various 
regional meetings, etc. There are many similarities here, 
generations succeed each other in the same way, there are the 
same changes of leadership, adjustments of one kind or another 
to programs and methods of operation. Parties have their 
diseases too: A party grows decrepit or suddenly gets younger, 
it begins to lean to the left or to the right, it acquires more 
liberalism or more conservatism. All this is political life. It 
is very interesting. The political life is probably the most 
interesting of all, because it does not get boring, something 
fresh is always coming along. 
  This work is always associated with youth, there is always a 
new, fresh, living impetus. Young hearts and souls become 
mature and enter adult life. A political party is a school too. 
Here too, new people arrive. There are the elders, the party 
veterans, and leaders' departures may be painful. Not every 
leader is ready to go of his own accord, sometimes they stay 
longer than they should. Sometimes this is a good thing, it 
means that a kind of continuity of course, stability, the 
party's face, is maintained. Or else there may simply be no 
other leader at a given stage. But there are parties where it 
is entirely possible for a change of leaders to occur every two 
or three years, or else a collective leadership is possible, the 
institution of cochairmanship. All this diversity makes up the 
bouquet that is political life. Sometimes it is fragrant, this 
bouquet, but sometimes it dies, or is swept aside by a 
dictatorial regime. 
  On the whole I personally am satisfied with my life, I have 
achieved what I wanted, even if I would only give myself a " 3 
." I am leader of a political party and I have been a candidate 
for the presidency of the republic. Today the whole world knows 
about me, not just the whole country -- from Kaliningrad to 
Kamchatka. They know me in Iraq as maybe the closest friend of 
the Iraqi people. In Finland, conversely, they are afraid of 
me. They are not too fond of me in Poland, but in Germany they 
are well disposed; certain political forces in France and South 
Africa are sympathetic, and Russian emigres in Australia, Spain, 
and Germany are well disposed toward me. I have supporters and 
opponents in every country of the world. I am famous. I have 
met personally with Saddam Husayn, who, for two years after the 
war, received no foreigners at all, least of all Russians. 
Deputies from the Russian parliament, leaders of various 
parties, and journalists went to see him, but he received only 
me in November 1992. We talked for four hours in his palace in 
Baghdad. It was an interesting trip. By plane to Amman, then 
nearly 14 hours through the desert to Baghdad. A week in 
Baghdad. A meeting with the country's supreme leader on 
Saturday 21 November. We talked for a long time; Saddam Husayn 
listened and asked questions. 
  I have seen the world, traveled to dozens of countries, met 
with leaders of political parties, and spoken in parliaments. I 
have been to the United Nations in New York and Geneva. At 
least I have seen enough of the world to gain the all-around 
outlook that is needed in order to head a political party in 
your own country. Many of our party leaders have never traveled 
anywhere at all. Some of them do not know their own country very 
well; they even have a poor command of their own language, not 
to mention foreign languages. 
  So I can say confidently that I have reached certain targets 
for a politician -- both from the viewpoint of domestic politics 
and in terms of the international situation. I am included 
among the group of eight leaders of right-wing political parties 
of the world, along with leaders from Germany, France, Italy, 
Britain, and Austria. My name is in various directories, there 
are reports on me by various intelligence services of the world, 
I am mentioned in ambassadors' dispatches, in correspondence 
between officials at the highest level, in reports to the 
presidents of the world's leading countries. For the most part, 
my self-esteem and vanity as a politician is satisfied. But it 
never was fanatical, and I was always an advocate of compromise. 
Tell me today: Cease all political activity, disband your 
party, it will help Russia, it will have a beneficial effect on 
the political situation. And I will do it. Maybe in six months 
I will be forgotten, I will be a "has-been," and maybe people 
will call me a failure -- so be it. It will be a good thing for 
my country, and that is the main aim. Not some idea, and not my 
name. The idea must be universal and comprehensible to 
everyone: Normal living conditions for everyone, pluralism in 
everything, democracy for everyone. A rule-of-law state, a 
multiparty parliament, a mixed economy, immutability of borders, 
the exclusion of violence from all relationships, from all 
spheres of human life. All this is understood, everyone wants 
it. But I see my place. And I am satisfied with the political 
outcome of my life, although maybe it is not the outcome, but 
just one of the first landings on the staircase I have climbed 
up, and I will be able to climb even higher and help the party I 
head, and help all Russians. 
  I very often hear words of support in various parts of 
Russia, from ordinary citizens, be it a Cossack from Krasnodar 
Kray or an inhabitant of the Urals or Siberia, or a Muscovite, 
or a Petersburger. And I am not perturbed by the false data of 
certain "sociological polls." I know a significant percentage 
is behind me, and if Russian presidential elections were held 
today, I would have a chance of victory. About 40 million 
voters may vote for me. And that is only natural, because when 
6 million voted for me two years ago, I was still virtually 
unknown. Independent sociological services conducted a poll 
among Muscovites -- this was in November 1992 -- in the waiting 
lines at Moscow's stores. Voting papers for elections for the 
president of the republic were distributed. Citizens filled 
them out again. After the count, in transpired that 29 percent 
were for me. The remaining candidates, Yeltsin included, did 
not even get 10 percent each. What better proof could there be? 
I received five or six times more votes than any other 
candidate. And that is a chance of victory. 
  I think there are still bright prospects ahead of us, and 
1993 is the last year of delay, instability, uncertainty. In 
1994, progress in a positive direction will begin. For sure, we 
will be able after all to form a new political leadership and 
establish a new concept as the foundation of all areas of our 
domestic and foreign policy. And we will go further, in order 
to safeguard the interests of all citizens of Russia without 
discrimination, so that life is good for everyone in Rus. This 
may, of course, look to some people like a fantasy, a dream, and 
it is indeed hard to do. But there is no need to promise 
"pineapple in champagne," you can promise a quiet life, a life 
of sufficiency. If a pensioner gets bread and butter, cheese, 
and kasha in the mornings and can have tea, coffee, or cocoa to 
drink. If he has a bit of salad to eat for lunch, a meatless 
cabbage soup or broth, a cutlet, and a fruit drink. And in the 
evening he has a bit of herring, some potatoes, and maybe a 
glass of kefir. If, when he feels like it, he can drink a glass 
of tea with honey cakes -- I think all this will be enough for 
him, he will be satisfied. And sometimes he will have fruit and 
candies, he will have enough money for a bath and to go to the 
movies, to pay the apartment expenses, and sometimes to buy a 
little present for the grandchildren. I think the pensioner 
will support us, he will be at peace. He will have a roof over 
his head, he will always have something to eat, something to 
wear. He should have a certain minimum. And it means that some 
of the population may even live well, very well, because people 
will have the opportunity to work honestly, and after that -- a 
secure old age. Because there will be no more revolutions and 
perestroykas in our country, we must put an end to all that. 
And in order to put an end to it and secure a decent life for 
ourselves for several hundred years to come, we must make the 
transition to a new geopolitical formula for the development of 
the Russian state. We must accomplish this surge of ours 
to the south, this last southern "Dash," the Russians' last 
campaign, in order once and for all to put an end to the danger 
on the Fatherland's southern borders and to help the peoples who 
are Russia's neighbors to gain a peaceful life and eliminate all 
hotbeds of war and tension, which lead to clashes and 
conflicts. 
  The southern campaign.... Once, the Red Cavalry was marching 
on Warsaw, and this was the slogan: "Forward, to the English 
Channel," "On to Warsaw, Berlin, the Channel." Then our 
cavalry, moving to the east, reached the Pacific Ocean, where 
their march ended. In 1979-1989 the Red Army went down to 
Afghanistan, and at one time, in 1919, the cavalry was marching 
from the west via Bulgaria to Constantinople, and there was no 
one in the path of this cavalry, only the Entente stopped its 
progress and the taking of Constantinople. And in 1916 the 
Russians reached the Iraqi border. And they were in northern 
Iran for many years, until 1946, I think. So the advance to the 
south is nothing new for Russia. 
  This is a normal direction of movement for Russia, its 
military structures, and its economic and cultural institutions. 
We should feel comfortable here -- both Persians and Turkmens. 
Turkmenia should not be divided into south and north. And the 
Tajiks should not live only in Afghanistan. There will simply 
be a liberated space where Uzbeks will live, and other peoples 
too -- Baluchis, Kurds, Assyrians. And how many peoples live in 
Dagestan? We should all live freely in this region -- from 
Kabul to Istanbul -- and put an end to the hotbeds of war, 
hostility, and hatred, and ensure prosperity and well-being for 
all the peoples, including the Russian people, who would be a 
stabilizing factor, an advanced post on the shore of the Indian 
Ocean. And they would be a restraining factor, to rule out 
clashes between Christians and Muslims, between Turkic speakers 
and Farsi speakers, between Shiites and Sunnites, field 
commanders, and so forth. Therefore Russia should go south and 
reach the shores of the warm Indian Ocean. This is not just my 
whim. It is Russia's destiny. It is fate. It is Russia's 
great exploit. We must do it, because we have no choice. There 
is no other way for us. It is geopolitics. Our development 
demands it. Like a child who has outgrown his clothes and must 
put on new ones. 
  And it is not a question of enslaving other peoples or 
seizing others' territories. There is a perpetual state of war 
there. Afghanistan, Iran, Iraq, the Kurds. The peoples are 
waiting for some kind of final solution to the problem. Take 
Dagestan -- if it was autonomous, could it exist? No, because 
every village has its own nationality. And each one would try 
to secure certain advantages. Dagestan is part of Russia, and 
its name, translated into Russian, means "mountain republic," 
without any national coloring. There are Avars, Tats, Kumyks, 
Nogai -- scores of peoples live there. And Chechens, and 
Ingush, and Russians, and Azerbaijanis -- the most diverse 
peoples. Take away Russia as a stabilizing factor -- and you 
have war there. Because even today the peoples there do not 
have clearly demarcated borders, their own national attributes, 
or special opportunities for national self-expression. Even 
given the existence of Russia as a stabilizing factor, not 
everything develops successfully there. Russia is a platform, a 
buffer, a wall, which every people can lean on in order to exist 
in peace, develop, and not seek to create its own "greater" 
state. Just as there is no "great" Russia. Because the word 
"great," in its original meaning, means big. Simply a big 
country. And it is indeed big -- from the Baltic to 
Vladivostok. That is how things have turned out. Denmark is a 
small country, you could not call it Great Denmark. There are 
big trees and small trees. A small tree may yield a great deal 
of fruit. For instance, a small peach or mandarin tree may 
yield a great deal of fruit, while a tall tree standing next to 
it yields no fruit at all. And yields nothing of any special 
usefulness. Just like people. A person's height does not 
determine his position in society. And the same is true of a 
nation. It is purely a quantitative indicator. Small and great 
peoples -- this is only a matter of numbers. And it need not 
even be mentioned, the nationalities question need not be 
touched on at all. In future, clearly, this could become as 
improper as talking about whether someone is beautiful or ugly. 
What is ugly to you may be beautiful to someone else. That is 
the way they were born. Take birds. There are sparrows, and 
there are eagles. The eagle is a beauty, with a strong beak and 
a wide wingspan. But the sparrow is alive, it wants to live, 
this is its life. Or dogs. There are unprepossessing 
watchdogs, and then there are powerful wolfhounds and English 
mastiffs -- pedigree dogs. But that is not to their credit. It 
is an inherent quality which does not give them any privileges. 
But even these examples are not entirely appropriate, because 
man is the highest entity, the highest being in nature. It is 
often impossible to draw analogies here. 
  But usually that is precisely what happens -- a small 
people is exterminated just because it is small and unable to 
defend itself. For instance, today the Georgians are waging war 
on the Ossetians in South Ossetia and on the Abkhaz in Abkhazia. 
But they are afraid to rise up against the Russians, or even 
against the Azerbaijanis, because there are more of them. So 
that means that if a people is small, you can kick it. But if 
it is big, you are afraid of it. Nobody would really dare to 
wage war on the Chinese, but they might risk it against the 
Mongolians or Tibetans. 
  So here in the south we will create equal conditions for all 
peoples. Everyone is entitled to describe himself as belonging 
to this or that nation. But passports will not contain the 
section "nationality," and that section will not appear on 
forms. Nationality will not determine a person's rights in any 
way. In the long term, even citizenship should not determine 
rights. Someone without citizenship is a person; he lives here, 
he has no local passport, he is a person without citizenship, 
but all the same he is a part of human society. A person cannot 
be deprived of rights because he has no citizenship, any more 
than because of particular political convictions, or because he 
is of a different nationality or a different religion, or his 
skin is a different color, or he is from a different tribe or a 
different locality. There should be no discriminatory factors. 
The south must be freed from this plague -- nationalism, 
chauvinism on the part of a big nation toward a small one, or 
nationalism on the part of a small nation with regard to a big 
neighbor. We must learn to respect ourselves as citizens, as 
men and women, as adults and children, with a common right to a 
normal, peaceful life. And nobody is entitled to resort to 
violence. Law and order should be the same everywhere. Human 
rights belong to everyone, everyone should be under the 
protection of the law, under the shelter of the law, which 
operates in time and space throughout this territory -- from 
Kabul to Istanbul, from the southern Indian Ocean coast to the 
coast of the Arctic Ocean. In Murmansk and on the shores of the 
Indian Ocean, we are all citizens of a single Russian state. It 
is the same whether you are in Kaliningrad or Chukotka, in 
Izmail or Taymyr, in St. Petersburg or on the Amur -- it is all 
one legal, economic, political, and financial area. 
  It is difficult to make it a single ecological area, because 
different places have different levels of environmental 
pollution. We are dependent -- on natural disasters and on the 
pollution of nature. It is therefore all the more necessary to 
create an atmosphere in relations precluding a transition to 
violent actions in resolving disputes of any kind -- any 
question, be it drainage systems, the division of land, housing 
questions, jobs, leisure, education, the army draft -- any 
question should be resolved only from the standpoint of civic 
responsibility. You live in a given locality, laws are in force 
here that are identical for all of us, we live in accordance 
with those laws, and all the commandments -- Christian, 
Biblical, Muslim, Judaic. Thou shalt not kill. Thou shalt not 
steal. Thou shalt not bear false witness. Thou shalt not 
commit violence. Help one another. All this is common 
knowledge. All this is in folklore, in fairy stories, in 
sermons, in moral teachings, in everyday life. All the grandmas 
and grandpas in the world teach their grandchildren well. But 
why do some children grow up to be good and kind, while others 
become murderers and rapists? Obviously something goes wrong in 
their education, and maybe there is not enough state 
participation in this. We do not take children away from bad 
families in time. Given that we have failed to prevent the 
emergence of a bad family, the state should have the resources 
to take a child away from such a family if only for a time, and 
to raise him in the conditions of a state children's home, 
school, or boarding school. And where children's homes exist, 
it is possible, on the other hand, to go over to family 
children's homes, to create the conditions so that adults can 
take children from these homes, so that the child can grow up in 
a family. This will not be 100 percent successful, but it is 
necessary to reduce to the minimum the number of children in 
state institutions. 
  Ultimately, the aim of any policy is the happiness of real 
people. It is not hard to put forward this formula: What does 
it matter if I am unhappy, as long as Russia is happy. But will 
Russia be happy if we are all unhappy? Obviously, sensible 
coexistence is needed, so that each of us lives well and the 
country as a whole lives well. So let's have less 
heroism, less renunciation: "I am prepared to sacrifice myself 
as long as my country is happy." If we all sacrifice ourselves, 
who is going to live in our country? Happiness and joy 
constitute the general well-being in the country. The health of 
every one of us is the country's happiness. Therefore our every 
day, our every effort of labor, every moment of our 
participation in any political sphere, should have this noble 
goal: To create, not destroy; to help. To give people joy, not 
to provoke their hatred; to be tolerant. We cannot have mobs of 
people running somewhere or other carrying sticks, beating 
somebody up, we cannot have stones and glass being thrown, cars 
being overturned and set on fire.... We cannot. 
  August 1991 in Moscow -- it is terrible. Armored personnel 
carriers are moving under the bridge over Kalinin Prospekt, and 
a mob of frenzied, half-drunk Muscovites stop an armored 
personnel carrier, drag the tank driver out, and try to set fire 
to the combat vehicle. Is this not barbaric? After all, even 
if it was to some extent unjustified -- to some extent barbaric 
-- to send in the troops, the attack on the troops and the 
attempts to beat up the tankmen or armored vehicle drivers and 
commit violence against them were even more barbaric. After 
all, the troops would simply have advanced further. Three 
Muscovites would not have been killed had it not been for this 
artificial clash, the attempts to provoke, to arouse hatred. 
Those guys, the tankmen, went into Moscow and stopped at 
specific places, they did not shoot, they did not threaten 
anyone, they climbed out of their tanks, bought ice creams, 
chatted up girls. Children and adults clambered onto the tanks 
and there was no threat. They were our tanks, they were our 
boys, it was our army. And they tried to blow this up into 
hostile acts of some kind, to provoke people into a major 
conflict. And the result was casualties. It was not the SCSE 
[State Committee for the State of Emergency] that did this, but 
the "Democratic Russians," certain adventurist forces who wanted 
to exacerbate the situation. 
  Then the same thing was repeated in Tajikistan. But here 
there were tens of thousands of casualties. So August 1991 in 
Moscow was not three days of the "putsch." It was the start of 
civil war in Russia. This war is already blazing in the North 
Caucasus. It is blazing in the Dniester region and in Central 
Asia. It is developing at a slower pace in the Baltic region, 
Tataria, and other regions. It is terrible. Therefore measures 
are needed, so that the country can provide itself with secure 
living conditions. In the late 20th century you cannot play with 
fire. We cannot move to other regions and start life all over 
again. We can only live where we live today. We need no great 
conquerors now -- no Alexander the Great, no Bonaparte, no 
Hitler. We do not need Pinochet today either. Although we have 
candidates for the Pinochet role -- General Lebed, Moscow 
militia chief Pankratov. There will always be those in Russia 
who are prepared to brandish the big stick and shout: "Grab 
them, arrest them, throw them in jail!" They will always exist 
elsewhere too, and this is plain to see today. Former criminals 
and lawbreakers who have served 20 years for murder suddenly 
become all but heads of state in the former territories of the 
USSR. At least, they head the Armed Forces or form part of the 
political leadership in those amorphous, artificial, pygmy 
states. These political games are impermissible. Therefore 
democracy also allows for violence. 
  How do I see Russia? I do not see Russia weeping, 
Berdyayev-style. I see a proud Russia, a Russia wherein the 
glorious traditions of its army will once again be realized, 
where talented Russian engineers and industrialists will create 
examples of the latest technology. After all, even today we 
could conquer the world with our electric motors. We should not 
try to catch up with Japan in electronics and computers. We 
have fallen behind in this sphere, and here we can use 
international experience. But we do have electric motors. We 
do have power engineering. That is one thing. Another thing -- 
space. We have fallen behind in motor vehicle building, but we 
can continue to develop the space industry and aviation. We 
could obtain the maximum advantages in this, to make up for our 
laggardness in motor vehicle building. Ours is a forest 
country. Therefore priority should be given to the timber 
industry. We should have the best furniture in the world. And 
we should only export the surplus. But today we are sending raw 
materials abroad. Gas, oil -- in the main these should be 
retained for domestic consumption, for future generations. It 
is wrong -- to pump it to other countries day and night via 
pipelines. Our economic policy and development priorities 
should be intelligent. 
  The new Russia will be technically well equipped with new 
plants, motors, engines, ecologically clean machinery; with 
medium-sized cities -- 500,000 or 1 million people. We do not 
want vast cities of 10 million people. A Russia that does not 
harm nature, that is sensible in its use of its water resources, 
forests, steppes, deserts, mountains -- all this is used in the 
interests of man, not in the interests of implementing the idea 
of some scientist or other who might die, while we would go on 
suffering for a long time after, trying to put his idea into 
practice, although this idea will be of no benefit to us. But 
on the other hand, we must help our scientists to realize their 
ideas here, in our country, and not to go abroad. We have a 
huge number of inventors, rationalizers, self-taught men, we 
have people who are ready to create an entirely new technology, 
to create conditions such that our industry will take a leading 
place in the world in every respect. Trade must be developed. 
Russian mercantile traditions must be restored so that Russian 
merchants import from abroad and from overseas the things that 
we ourselves lack, and export from Russia only what we have a 
surplus of. 
  That is how I see Russia. It will have the world's 
strongest army, strategic forces, our missiles with multiple 
launchers. Our space combat platforms, our "Buran" spaceship 
and "Energiya" rockets -- this is the country's rocket shield. 
Total security, we have no rival. But nor should we lay claim 
to world domination, to tell other peoples how they should live, 
to interfere in their affairs -- in no circumstances. 
  It will be a new Russia, without "devils," without 
fanaticism, a Russia where Orthodoxy and the Christian religion 
hold the dominant position. We must not permit alien religions 
to disturb the minds of the young generation of Russians, that 
does not lead to rapprochement between the peoples, it hampers 
the correct perception of the realities around us. We must 
help the Russian Orthodox religion to take its proper place, but 
at the same time we must be tolerant. We must take the 
nationalities issue off the agenda, so that nobody should ever 
suffer a moment's hesitation over the thought that something 
might violate his rights on national grounds. Still less should 
there be any grounds for discrimination on the basis of 
political or economic convictions. The new Russia means a 
rule-of-law state, a secular state, it means a strong 
presidential regime, a strong multiparty parliament, it means 
legislation that lasts for centuries, that does not have to be 
changed every 10 years. It means a Constitution respected by 
everyone -- from children to old people. It means a single set 
of symbols across the country -- the black, yellow, and white 
flag, the state flag of Russia. It should fly over all state 
institutions, in every region of our vast Fatherland. It means 
the national anthem, a single anthem. It means a state 
language, the language of interethnic intercourse -- Russian. 
It means a single monetary unit -- the ruble. It means a 
single system of finance, transportation, communications, 
energy, ecology, defense, and foreign policy. And at the same 
time self-government everywhere, in every region and territory 
-- full self-government, the resolution of all local issues 
autonomously, through the local dumas, state assemblies, organs 
of representative, power and organs of administration. Why go 
to Moscow to tackle day-to-day tasks? 
<H3>  RUSSIANS, THE DESTINY OF RUSSIA IS IN THE HANDS OF EVERY ONE 
OF YOU </H3>
  Men and women, wherever you live, whatever your life is like 
-- joyful or joyless, whether you live with a family or on your 
own, whether you have achieved success in your professional 
field or in the pleasures of love, whether you are a sportsman 
or an unsuccessful artist, an actor at the beginning of your 
career or an eminent architect, a sewage worker or an engineer, 
a traffic inspector or a medical orderly -- you are Russians, 
and you should not expect anyone to bring you joy and happiness. 
But whereas lunch, breakfast, and dinner really do depend on 
your own pocketbook, which may at any given moment be full or 
empty, as for being able to walk peacefully through the streets 
of your native city, look any passerby frankly and directly in 
the eyes, feel that you are a citizen of your state -- everyone 
should be able to do that. To live in security, to look with 
pride on your country's state flag, to listen to its state 
anthem with a lump in your throat -- whenever you hear it, at 
the stadium, in the concert hall, on the radio, abroad, to stand 
still at that moment, as the country's state flag flutters or is 
hoisted on the flagstaff in the square. As a military unit goes 
past, to stop at the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier and the 
monument to the heroes who fell in the struggle for our 
Motherland's freedom. To know that while you are out walking, 
or calling on friends, or at work, nobody is going to break into 
your apartment, that your daughter is not going to be raped, 
that she will grow up in peace and get married, to know that 
your son is not going to be beaten up and maimed in the street 
by the local hooligans, or in the army, or while away on 
business, or while on vacation somewhere, especially in the 
south -- all these things should be the attributes of the state 
in which you live. And all this is our Russia, yours and mine, a 
cold and hungry Russia, with its rain, its impassable roads, its 
contaminations, its malnutrition, its great victories, the 
smiles of our "great leaders," our so-called leaders, and the 
glum faces of those who succeed them -- but still it is our 
Russia, yours and mine. The Russia that has fought every enemy 
-- from East, West, North, and South, the Russia that is somehow 
incapable of resolving the problem of impassable roads. If only 
it were resolved. If roads were finally built all over Russia. 
Good, concrete roads, with a solid median strip and a telephone 
every three kilometers. And vehicle servicing stations, and gas 
pumps everywhere, and everything all lit up, and signposts, 
intersections, and viaducts everywhere. We have done it in 
space. Now our achievements must be brought down to earth. 
  Bring the achievements of space to the earth. Make life 
pleasant for every one of us. We were delighted when the first 
cosmonauts returned, in the first years of space exploration. 
But when we went out in the streets of our city and saw the 
poor state of the road, the gates falling down, a clattering 
streetcar or decrepit trolleybus, and the eternal, eternal 
waiting lines outside all the stores -- all this quickly spoiled 
our mood. We really "lived for victories." First, victory in 
the civil war, but who vanquished whom? Brother killed brother. 
Then victory in collectivization. Again, at whose expense? 
Good, strong peasants were driven out of the villages, the 
weak, the scum, and the drunkards were declared kolkhoz members, 
and they called that the victory of the kolkhoz system. Then the 
next victory, when, by the labor of "zeks" [convicts] without 
rights, vast plants were built. But how many died, in wooden 
huts, in terrible conditions! And that was a victory too -- for 
industrialization. And when many thousands of army commanders 
were liquidated to make way for ignoble, incompetent, weak 
officers -- that was a victory too. For cadre policy. Finally, 
with all our might, with bloodshed, we stopped the fascist beast 
and pushed him back to the West -- that was a victory too. At 
the cost, on their side, in numerical terms, of 10 million dead, 
and on our side, 26 million -- nearly one to three. If it had 
been one to one, we would not have won. There were just more of 
us. And it's colder here. And the roads are bad. If Russia 
had had roads like Europe, and the same climate, and 
proportionately the same population, Germany would have 
conquered us, as it conquered France, where there was the same 
climate, the same roads, and approximately the same population 
-- 50-60 million people. You cannot achieve victory by sending 
millions to the grave. You cannot go into space but leave 
entire sectors of industry undeveloped. You cannot produce a 
vast quantity of arms and not produce the most essential goods 
for the population, for every one of us. We are perpetually 
waiting in line for something or other -- socks, underpants, 
light bulbs, razors, batteries, teapots, condoms, furniture, 
cars. Well, all the time. Never a day or a year, not a single 
region, where everything is available and there are no waiting 
lines. But in Germany and France, all over Europe, this is not 
so, and we can reach their level, if every Russian takes 
Russia's fate in his own hands. You have to feel you are a 
citizen, you have to finally achieve national self-awareness -- 
I am Russian [russkiy], I am a citizen of Russia [rossiyanin]. 
I want to live in a rich, civilized country where human rights 
are implemented, where nobody looks at a form to see what party 
you belong to, what is your nationality, your social origin. 
Nobody reads your resume, the personnel people do not call and 
ask: How well did he work for you? What are his views, what 
did you notice about him? That should not happen. And your 
passport should be simple. Surname, first name, date and place 
of birth -- and that is all, nothing more should concern the 
state. Everything else is personal. Nationality, religion, 
family status, and so forth -- that is everyone's personal 
business. We are given a name to distinguish us from other 
people, and you have to know someone's age, since it is a kind 
of measure of progress through life. But everything else is of 
no significance, should be of no significance. A time will come 
when there will be no passports in Russia. The residence permit 
is already disappearing, although for the time being it is still 
needed in order to combat the pilgrimage of southerners to 
Russia's European centers. They have already crept across the 
Urals. Like toadstools, or cockroaches.... 
  Russians, proud people, the 21st century will belong to us 
despite everything! In the next seven years we will finally 
stop all the revolutions, all the perestroykas, all the 
Gorbystroykas, we will put an end to Yeltsinism and 
Burbulitsism. The Poltoranins and Gaydars will depart. All 
this will go. And we will enter the 21st century changed and 
pure. Right now we are in the bath. We are washing away the 
scabs, the dirt that have accumulated throughout the 20th 
century. Sometimes this draws blood. That is bad. But clearly 
even this was necessary to us, to our sorrowful country, in 
order finally to wash away the contagion, the Satanic infection, 
that afflicted us early in the century, that was unloosed on 
central Russia from the West in order to poison the country and 
undermine it from within -- through communism, through 
nationalism, through cosmopolitanism, through the influence of 
alien religions, alien ideas, an alien way of life. We will put 
an end to this. We will emerge as the most fire-hardened nation. 
  But we must feel it, we must begin to think in national 
terms, we must at last become Russian. Not communists, not 
"Democratic Russians," but first we must become Russian, we must 
become citizens of Russia, we must at long last become citizens 
of our Fatherland, of our Eurasian continent. And we will be 
pleased to become part of a common European home, but a big 
home, a home for everyone -- from the English Channel to 
Vladivostok. The Mitterrand option will not work. We do not 
want a curtailed Europe, we do not want a game reserve for those 
who robbed Africa and Russia and now want to fence themselves 
off from us and live for their own pleasure. Let us live 
honestly, openly. We Russians are prepared for that. By 
Russians we mean all who speak and think in Russian, who do not 
extol their own nation above others, do not taunt others, do not 
yearn for violence or world domination. We do not want world 
domination. Nor do we want some other power to take steps to 
become the sole superpower and rule the world. 
  We say to the Americans: Stop in time. We say to Bill 
Clinton: Do not repeat the mistakes of Napoleon and Hitler. 
You, Bill Clinton, are my age, you and I belong to the same 
generation in the same world. America will also soon begin to 
disintegrate, there too, much that is negative has accumulated, 
there too, many problems and interethnic clashes will spring up. 
Ahead of you lies your own perestroyka, your sickness, your 
degradation. And we Russians will not gloat when some of the 
states begin to secede, when your plants shut down, when you do 
not have enough food or medicines, when people start leaving 
America for Europe, Russia, Japan, South Africa, Australia. We 
will not gloat when California goes over to Mexico, when a negro 
republic is founded in Miami, when the Russians take back 
Alaska. When you no longer have the United States of America, 
but the Commonwealth of New States of America, and Washington 
does not govern the United States, but there are separate 
governments in San Francisco, Chicago, Philadelphia, Texas.... 
We will not humiliate you if you have to ask the international 
banks for a loan or ask for the repayment of past debts to be 
deferred. You already have a huge domestic and foreign debt 
today. You already have a huge number of problems today. So do 
not dig a hole for others, and do not spit in the well that you 
too will have to drink from. 
  We Russians have no hostile feelings toward Americans. We 
have never been involved in a direct conflict with them; on the 
contrary, we shook hands as allies on the Elbe River, in 
Germany, after together overcoming the most terrible aggressor 
of the 20th century. And today you should make no mistake. The 
Chinese stopped in time. Mao's ideas did not grip the world, 
and the Maoist revolution did not go beyond the borders of 
China. The Japanese also lay no claim to world domination. The 
Germans have had enough of war forever and do not want to take 
part in any military conflict. And Sweden has completely 
forgotten what war is. After a defeat by the Russian Army, the 
Swedes renounced waging war anywhere ever again. You Americans 
remain the last nation, the last people, the last state, that 
still makes a noise, that still sends in its quick reaction 
forces, that dictates, imposes its will on Iraq, Libya, Serbia. 
Leave these peoples in peace. Stop the blockade of Iraq, 
Libya, and Serbia, do not interfere in the affairs of Europe, 
Asia, Africa, Latin America, Australia. Look after your own 
problems. Let us at long last go over to regional cooperation. 
Let us really end the Cold War. Do not tell us what to do in 
the Baltic, in Central Asia, in the Dniester region, in the 
Transcaucasus. And we will not tell you what to do in the 
southern states, or ask why you kidnapped the legitimate 
president of Panama, Noriega, why you sent a landing force to 
the island of Grenada and destroyed the Maurice Bishop regime 
there -- although this is barbarity, naked aggression, 
interference in other peoples's affairs, and violation of 
international and national law. A time may come when you will 
have to answer for it. You demand arms cuts. Fine, let's make 
cuts. But simultaneously. We will not disarm unilaterally. We 
agree to withdraw the troops from Europe, but you withdraw yours 
too. The Germans, for instance, are keener for you to get out 
of Europe than us. They would rather be left with Russian 
troops in their country than Americans. And in many countries 
of the world there is a desire for you to remove your bases. 
Americans, let us put an end to the tension in the world which 
emanates from you as well as us. Let us not make mutual 
accusations, humiliate each other, and look to see who has more 
warheads, tanks, aircraft, or submarines, let us agree to a 
balance of forces in the world, the division of spheres of 
influence, the principle of regional cooperation, the principle 
of North-South relations, let us end all tension in West-East 
relations and rule out war forever. So you Americans must leave 
the Balkans and the Near East. The world will say "thank you." 
Otherwise one fine day it will put you in the dock, and you 
will face the threat of a new Nuremberg, if your hotheads do not 
cool down. 
  But we believe in the Americans' good sense, because they 
are a fusion of representatives of different nations from all 
over the world. We have no chauvinism or frenzied nationalism. 
We would like to believe that you do not seek domination by 
your nation over others. Remember, you survive thanks to theft 
under the cloak of state institutions. First you plundered 
Latin America and Africa and grew rich out of two world wars, 
and for the last 50 years you have been stealing "brains," and 
that is the most valuable thing in the world -- the human brain. 
Throughout the 20th century, the best minds have been sailing, 
flying, journeying to your country from all over the world. A 
scientist may experience some temporary difficulties and 
depression, so he goes to your country to work. But at the same 
time he automatically enriches you, makes you stronger. You 
must know that your wealth is not the achievement of the 
indigenous people of America or of those first settlers. This 
wealth was created by Russians, among others, because nearly all 
America's mathematicians are Soviet Jews who left the USSR. A 
great many Russians work in various American laboratories today. 
It is the same in Germany, where there is not only the blood of 
Russian soldiers, but the sweat of Russian workers who worked in 
Germany for 30-40 years more after the war, restoring it and 
making it rich. Therefore everything that America has achieved 
was achieved by the labor of all nations and ethnic groups. 
  We are today divided by artificial borders, the population 
is 
now intermingled everywhere. There are Russians living 
everywhere today -- in Germany, France, America, Australia, 
Spain -- hundreds of thousands, millions of Russians have 
dispersed across the world. The same is true of representatives 
of other peoples: There are Italians, for instance, living 
everywhere -- in Europe and America. These are artificial 
borders, formalities, and we should not wage war because of 
this. So let us calm down, let us concern ourselves with our 
domestic problems and problems associated with the immediate 
region. For America, that will be the southern states and 
Mexico and the adjacent localities -- the Caribbean region. For 
France, it is North Africa. And for Russia it is Afghanistan, 
Iran, Turkey. People must agree on this and not get in the way, 
not interfere. The same for China. It has interests in 
Mongolia and South Asia. But it should not be taking sidelong 
looks at what the Russians are doing in Afghanistan, still less 
in Iran or Turkey. The same for Japan. It is prepared to agree 
to Russia having access to the shores of the Indian Ocean, but 
it wants certain islands in the Kuril chain. A solution could 
be found here, maybe Japan could be given something. For 
instance, somewhere or other in that great archipelago of 
islands which we have not fully exploited, but which Japan very 
much wants. A formula could be found whereby Japan's interests 
would also be taken into account. Thus, favorable conditions 
could be created for all mankind, so that our planet is not 
stricken by political AIDS or a political Chernobyl. And the 
Russians will have the last word, because the Americans will 
ultimately agree with our stance, with our formula for the 
geopolitical development of the world, as a result of which 
Russia will complete the establishment of its southern borders 
and accomplish its last "dash" to the south. 
  Russia once saved the world from the Ottoman Empire by 
sending its troops to the south, and the Ottoman Empire, which 
had extended over three continents -- North Africa, southern 
Europe, Asia Minor -- fell as a result of 30 wars with Russia. 
Maybe, had it not been for Russia, all of Europe would have 
been Turkicized, because the Turks had already seized Budapest 
and besieged Vienna, so it was not much farther to Berlin, 
Paris, and the Channel. And seven centuries ago we stopped the 
Mongols. We could have let them pass and accepted their 
domination. And what would have been left of Europe then? We 
have saved it several times: From the south, from the east, 
from the north, and from the center of Europe itself, when the 
fascist plague triumphed in Germany, Italy, Portugal, Spain, and 
Greece. Thanks to the Russians, Europe was liberated from 
fascism. Europe helped Russia to liberate itself from 
communism. We helped each other. But the Russians suffered 
more losses, because Russia is located on the Eurasian 
continent, and therefore we stopped the most terrible aggressor 
in the world -- seven centuries ago, and again 50 years ago. So 
other peoples ought to be grateful to the Russians. The 
Russians have carried freedom on their shoulders, whatever 
uniform they wear -- that of the czarist Army, the Soviet Army, 
or the Russian Army. We have not enslaved peoples, driven them 
into slavery, or made them work for us. To this day we have not 
received adequate compensation from the Germans, from the 
French, from the Japanese, from the Swedes, from the Turks, from 
the Poles -- from a single one of the aggressors who have 
trampled and destroyed our country and our people. 
  The world should be grateful to Russia for its role as 
savior. And this is not Russia's reward for the troubles it has 
borne in fulfilling its historic mission every 100 years. It is 
Russia's natural development. It is its awakening and its 
ability once again to help the peoples of the south to gain true 
liberation, that the hour of silence may come at last in the 
Near and Middle East, in Asia Minor and Central Asia. Only 
Russia can help here. The Russian Army will assemble for the 
last time for its southern campaign and will stop forever on the 
shores of the Indian Ocean. Beyond that there is nowhere to go, 
beyond that are the warm waters of the Indian Ocean which wash 
the shores of our eternal friend India, of Iraq, of our 
strategic allies. The warm ocean breeze will soothe everyone 
living in this new geopolitical area, within these new borders 
of Russia. The Russian flag will threaten no one, and the 
Russian fleet in the Indian Ocean will pay friendly visits to 
the ports of India, the Persian Gulf, and East Africa. We will 
be friends with everyone, and especially South Africa. We are 
linked to it by special interests in the sphere of the economy, 
culture, and geopolitics. And these will be North-South 
relations. We will not overlap with the interests of the 
Chinese and Japanese, who will have special relations with the 
Philippines, Australia, Indonesia, and Southeast Asia. We will 
not go to West Africa, where Western Europe has interests. 
Still less will our path ever cross that of Latin America or 
the interests of the North American states. The world gains the 
order it has long needed, with no swastikas and no red stars, no 
Gestapo and no KGB. The world wants a firm, guaranteed order at 
long last, and the rivers will be cleaner, the water we drink 
will be cleaner. We will be able to relax more, we will become 
calmer. 
  We will understand each other, because every family will 
have 
the home it wants -- in a big city or a small one, in a mountain 
village or settlement, in the tropics, in the forest, on the 
mountainside, and in that home will be whoever you like. One 
wife or three, or none. One child or 10. You can have cows and 
sheep, or scientific instruments. It is up to you. Every 
family will live by its own laws, but respecting the laws of the 
neighboring family, the nearby settlement or city. The law is 
general, universal, according to a single formula: Do not kill, 
do not steal, do not deceive. That is what is needed, if we are 
to have equal opportunities. 
  All peoples are talented. Some people are good at grazing 
livestock, some grow flowers, some are good at fishing. Let us 
give each the task that suits him. In sport, in science, in 
creative work, in art, in any profession, under any climate. We 
will live peacefully and there will be no dominant ideology, no 
power will be able to claim authority or the right to establish 
a world order. And we will not threaten each other with 
"Russian Ivan" or "Uncle Sam." There will be fewer diseases. 
Hunger should disappear, because there is enough food and we 
will be able to distribute it to the needy. And all this will 
become possible when Russia gains its national self-awareness in 
tandem with the international -- not in order to raise up the 
Russians and send other peoples down to the depths. But in 
order, by raising up the Russians, to raise up all those who 
live alongside them, this whole Eurasian continent from Brest to 
Kabul and from Yamal to Istanbul. 
  Some people may say: The peoples of the south do not want 
your help or your geopolitical concepts. We will resist, we 
will wage war on you, eternal war, we will give you an eternal 
Afghanistan. This is a misconception, because in 1979-1989 the 
Red Army was in Afghanistan under communist banners. If this 
had been a czarist foreign policy, all the questions there would 
have been resolved long ago. The psychological factor is of 
great significance -- who it is who is implementing a given 
policy. There is no room for debate here. 
  Latvia will be part of Russia. There will be a small 
Lithuanian state within Russia. If you really want to live in a 
small, close-knit Ukraine, then there could be a small Ukrainian 
Republic. 
  But all this is only possible on condition that Russia 
reaches the south and stops at the shores of the Indian Ocean. 
Therefore the Finns, Lithuanians, and Estonians have an 
interest in ensuring that Russia establishes new borders. The 
Japanese, Chinese, and Hindus also have an interest in this. 
Arabs and Europeans too. This is the only way they will be 
freed from the Israeli trap, and America will finally gain 
tranquillity, being freed from megalomania, from the need to 
maintain its authority and remain the sole superpower. It will 
be easier for everyone, the world will breathe more freely, 
having acquired a recipe for reliability. 
  But the planet is vast. Peoples are different. You cannot 
implement a policy that will please absolutely everyone. That is 
not possible even within one state, or, indeed, within a family. 
Where you have mom, pop, and two children, someone is always 
going to be dissatisfied. Especially if you add a grandma and a 
grandpa. There will always be a "hornet's nest," always 
conflicts of some kind. We cannot make the world free from 
conflict, but we can deliver it from the threat of 
self-annihilation. 
  We cannot rid mankind entirely of disease. We will always 
catch colds, which will be called upper respiratory tract 
infections, flu, tonsillitis, pharyngitis. Conflicts are 
inevitable, after all. Just as you cannot avoid conflicts 
between man and woman. We will never be able to make everyone 
happy without exception. So that all women get husbands, all 
men get wives, and all of them have children, and they are all 
lively and healthy. This will never happen. It is every young 
couple's wish to become man and wife, to have children, to have 
their own home, the job they want, and to raise the children. 
But often this does not happen. There is no housing, the 
children get sick, the family breaks up, there are problems at 
work, conflicts with relatives -- this will always happen. And 
it is the same between peoples. 
  People will still tell jokes about Chukchis or Jews, about 
Russian Ivan or about the Caucasians, about khokhols [derogatory 
term for Ukrainians] -- one way or another, we will always go in 
for some kind of "hazing." But it should not end in the grave, 
as happens in our army. 
  A river carries away stones, sand, and silt. It moves. This 
is nature, and man is part of nature. But it is essential to 
regulate the processes -- so as to eliminate fascism, so as to 
eliminate communism, so as to eliminate the seizing of other 
people's countries, lands, airplanes. Suppose one of the 
passengers on an aircraft has too much to drink. By doing this, 
he harms himself. But if a terrorist comes along, a hijacker -- 
that is a threat to hundreds of people's lives. We must resist 
him. His actions must be neutralized. 
  Similarly, in a geopolitical formula, you cannot find some 
kind of ideal solution for everyone. I know there will be many 
protests in Kabul, Tehran, Ankara. But why do they think we 
should not be opposed to their plans for creating a greater 
Turkic state? What was Colonel Turkes, founder of the party of 
national order, put in prison for? For his ideas about Turan, a 
greater Turkic state from Istanbul to the Altay. The Turks 
themselves put him in prison for that. These nationalist ideas, 
these pan-Turkic sentiments, have come to the fore periodically, 
but in any case they have always existed in Turkish society, 
among academics, students, civil servants. The same is true of 
Tehran's attempt to disseminate the ideas of the Islamic 
revolution. In Afghanistan this has almost succeeded, but Iran 
has not yet succeeded, but is clearly trying to extend this to 
Azerbaijan and subsequently Turkey. Do pan-Islamic ideas help 
to improve the world order? Do they not constitute a threat to 
mankind? To all mankind. What about Kabul? It is perpetual 
war there. Zahir Shah, President Daud, the Afghan communists -- 
from Nur Mohamed Taraki to Najibullah. There is no such people 
as the Afghan people. There are various peoples -- Uzbeks, 
Kharizeytsy [as transliterated], Tajiks, Pushtuns, Daris. Why 
should they not live as they wish, without breaking up into 
gangs headed by field commanders? Is this not a threat to 
peace? And what about the perpetual clashes between Pakistan 
and India? All this must come to an end some time. 
  There has been, is, and will be dissatisfaction with our 
idea. But just as in an individual family there is always 
someone who is dissatisfied with the established order there, so 
in the big family of people of our planet not everyone will 
agree with the order that could be established. They should 
accept it, be reconciled to it, for the sake of the majority. 
Just as Russia's communists should accept that the majority of 
Russians do not want the kind of communism that they tried to 
implement in the form of the Stalinist-Brezhnevite model. 
  Russia's move to the south is primarily a defensive measure, 
a countermeasure, because today there is a threat to Russia from 
the south: From the direction of Afghanistan, which is already 
attacking Tajikistan, from the direction of Tehran, which is 
building plans for the pan-Islamic seizure of vast territories, 
from the direction of Ankara, where plans for a greater Turkic 
state were prepared long ago. Pan-Turkism is a threat to 
Russia, because it has a large Turkic-speaking population, 
Muslim, Farsi-speaking -- and all this is useful soil, a good 
incentive for Afghanistan, Iran, and Turkey to move up toward 
the north, creating a greater Afghanistan, a greater Iran, a 
greater Turkey. As a minimum, Turkey dreams of Azerbaijan and 
the Caucasus, of Georgia, so as to become a land of four seas -- 
the Black Sea, the Mediterranean, the Caspian, and the Sea of 
Marmara, and even the Aegean. And Russia loses everything -- 
the "great and talented" Turkish people deserve to live at the 
very center of the world, in a fragrant region, on the shores of 
six seas, while the weak, impotent Russian people should perish. 
Is that how you determine the history of mankind? No, that is 
impossible. 
  Nothing will happen to the world even if the entire 
Turkish nation perishes, although I do not wish that upon it. 
But let the Turks remember how they came to Asia Minor, 
barbarously seized Constantinople and plundered it, and 
butchered and subjugated all the peoples inhabiting Asia 
Minor. Let them remember how they butchered 1.5 million 
Armenians in April 1915. Let them remember that, and let 
mankind's conscience shudder when a whole people is butchered in 
three nights. And millions of Kurds languish under the Turkish 
yoke and cannot live in a Kurdish state. A bitter fate has 
divided them. A large number live in eastern Anatolia, in 
Turkish territory, while some live in the territory of Syria, 
northern Iraq, western Iran, and the Transcaucasus. This is a 
people 30 millions strong. And they have the right to gain 
national freedom. And who can give them that right? Only 
Russia. 
  The aggressor and his victim cannot be placed in the same 
pan 
of the scales today. We must finally understand who brought 
civilization to this world. Who opened up outer space; and who 
occupied foreign countries, plundered other peoples, drove them 
into slavery, and burned Christian churches or turned them into 
mosques. 
  What culture did the Turks bring to the territory of Asia 
Minor? Tourists from the West traveling in Turkey are to this 
day shown the remains of Byzantine culture. There is no such 
thing as Turkish culture, culture does not go with the bare 
saber. And who formed the basis of the new Turkish Army? The 
Janissaries. What were they? Slav boys taken captive along 
with their parents. The parents were killed, but the boys were 
raised in the Turkish spirit and formed the might of their 
forces. It was a strange thing for Slav boys to wipe out Slav 
peoples under Turkish flags. Who will answer for that? Who 
will pay for the violence against Byzantine culture, against the 
Slav peoples? There was no Nuremberg trial for the Turks who 
committed genocide against the Armenian people. Yet what is the 
difference between Turks and Germans? The fascist regime was to 
blame for 50 million deaths. There were only 70-80 million 
Germans. It was the same when the 17-million-strong Turkish 
people annihilated 1.5 million Armenians. The proportion is the 
same. The Turks brought as much evil upon mankind as the 
Germans. But the Germans, their party, their ideology, were put 
on trial. They were placed under international tutelage. There 
are still troops in Germany to this day. But nobody punished 
the Turks. It seems you can annihilate the Armenians because 
they are a small people. But you cannot annihilate the French, 
the Russians, or the English, you will be put on trial for that. 
All peoples are equal. Nobody is permitted to perpetrate 
genocide. Today Georgia is annihilating the Abkhaz and the 
Ossetians, and Europe is silent. Go ahead, crush Sukhumi with 
tanks. Dismember Abkhaz bodies. After all, your leader 
Shevardnadze helped to shake the USSR's position in Europe and 
to shatter the USSR's military might throughout the world. And 
in gratitude for this, Mr. Shevardnadze is permitted to engage 
in political gangsterism. There are not many Abkhaz, but they 
are a people, they want to live, to live in their own land and 
freely. But they are deprived of that right. This is genocide, 
it is racism, it is fascism, and it is happening today. Who 
will stop all this? 
  And what about the clashes between Azerbaijanis and 
Armenians? How long will this go on? Until the Armenian people 
are wiped out. Only not by Turks this time, but by 
Azerbaijanis. Another Turkic-speaking people. After all, 
basically Azerbaijanis and Turks are the same thing. In 1915 
the Turks butchered 1.5 million Armenians, and the Azerbaijanis 
have been butchering them since February 1986, that is five 
years now. The Turks did it in three nights, but the 
Azerbaijanis will go on for 15 years. And they will try to wipe 
out the Armenians totally, so as ultimately to wipe out the 
Armenian state entirely. Why? Because it is a Christian state. 
It is preventing two Turkic-speaking peoples, the Azerbaijanis 
and the Turks, from uniting. What is Nakhichevan? It is an 
artificial formation. An Azerbaijani population on Armenian 
territory. That was Armenia of old, that has always been 
Armenia. A land of three seas -- the Caspian, the Black Sea, the 
Mediterranean. And what has become of Armenia today? A little 
belt of land is all that remains of a great state, a state with 
a great culture, it was the first slaveowning state on the 
territory of what is now Russia. 
  Urartu. A civilization began there, and spread further. Its 
own church. Its own script. As for the Azerbaijanis, they are 
a Persian tribe who rose to the top as conquerors. At that time 
the Turks were advancing from the east. They Turkicized this 
Persian tribe. What are the Azerbaijanis? A tribe that lived 
on the shores of the Caspian Sea -- in Khazer [as 
transliterated]. That is not the name of a country, it 
designates a locality where citizens live. It is like the 
inhabitants of Sokolniki -- that is not a nationality, it is 
just a district of Moscow. It is the same with Azerbaijan. It 
is an inhabited region on the shores of the Caspian Sea. 
  So there is nothing to reproach the Russians with. We do 
not intend to punish the Turkish, Iranian, or Afghan peoples. 
But we want freedom for the peoples who live in the south. But 
today the whole of the south is bathed in blood. And the 
guardians of the Islamic revolution are wiping out all the 
dissidents in Iran. They made war on Iraq for 10 years. What 
for? For what purpose? The Kurds' actions in pursuit of 
freedom have been suppressed for 10 years. Turkish forces bomb 
civilians from the air, they crush Kurdish settlements with 
tanks. So let the Kurdish people perish -- and they are by no 
means a small people. There are 30 million of them. A big 
state, by European standards. But Europe is silent. Relations 
with Ankara are advantageous to it. There is your European 
"hazing." Let us close our eyes to the Kurdish problem, and 
then the Turks will have good relations with us Europeans. And 
what did the Turks do with the communists? They lured them into 
boats, took them out into the Black Sea, slaughtered them, and 
threw the bodies into the sea. That is how to deal with the 
political opposition. And that's democracy? That is barbarity, 
that is savagery. 
  Lenin thought Kemal was a Turkish Bolshevik. He gave him 
weapons and money. What was the result? In World War II Turkey 
was supposed to attack the Caucasus, and many of our troops were 
there waiting for this attack. The Turkish command had all its 
plans ready. Stalin's mistake was not to punish Turkey at the 
end of World War II. Turkey should have been punished, it was 
to blame for the deaths of many Russian soldiers at the 
Klukhorskiy Pass and other Caucasus crossings, because Beriya 
did not allow the fresh Transcaucasian divisions to be used to 
help the northern Caucasus in the fight against the Germans who 
were surging toward Groznyy, Baku, Makhachkala -- all because of 
the threat of attack from the Turks. So Turkey really did take 
part in World War II, just like Japan, which we punished. But 
only because the Americans wanted that. Japan attacked Pearl 
Harbor. The Turks did not attack Vienna or Paris, so nobody 
demanded punishment for Turkey. Yet Turkey hindered our war on 
the Germans. Because of Turkey's stance, more of our soldiers 
died and more of our territories were seized. So Turkey was 
also a participant in World War II on the side of fascist 
Germany. But it was not punished. 
  There may be a different opinion and different views on 
this. 
And who will be the judge? Will we Russians be wrong to defend 
the Armenians not only as Christians, but as a people who have 
over many centuries been undergoing destruction from the south, 
east, and west? Will we be wrong if we give freedom to the 
Kurdish people and the Baluchis? Will we not be right to make 
it possible for Uzbeks, Tajiks, Pushtuns, and Daris to live in 
that whole area -- from Tashkent to Kabul -- to live freely and 
go where they want, as long as there are no gangs. Will they 
not be grateful to us? And southern Azerbaijan, for the 
opportunity of unification with northern Azerbaijan? It is one 
Azerbaijani people. But there are around 16 million of them 
living in northern Iran, and they cannot speak their native 
language and consider themselves Azerbaijanis. What about the 
Baluchis? What about the Arabs in the southern part of Iran? 
They will all be grateful to us, including the Persians, 
including the Turks. Because today they live on the island of 
Cyprus as if in a fortress under siege. It is a Greek island, 
it was never Turkish. And it should become Greek again. It 
should be a free Cypriot republic, or else part of Greece. But 
Cyprus should not be occupied by Turkish troops. How many 
Greeks were wiped out? How many Greek women were raped? They 
can tell you that in Athens. Did the Dardanelles ever belong to 
the Turks? It always belonged to Greece. And Thrace? That is 
the territory of Bulgaria and Greece. So why are the occupiers 
still there from the period when the great powers were at war 
among themselves? Now that we are going over to regional 
cooperation, everything could be returned to its rightful place 
here. So that there will be no labels -- aggressor, occupier. 
And the Turks can live throughout that area, they can come back 
as far as Tashkent and Ashgabat, to Karakalpakia, further down, 
to the Aral Sea -- to where they came from in the quest for 
better lands. 
  But you should improve the lands where you were born and 
where you live, rather than seizing other people's cities and 
countries by wiping out the citizens who live there and wiping 
out that culture. To this day they have created nothing in Asia 
Minor to replace what was once there. Asia Minor, Greece, Rome, 
Mesopotamia, Egypt -- all this was under Turkish dominion, all 
this was seized by force and languished in slavery for 
centuries. And only Russia liberated North Africa and southern 
Europe from Turkish dominion, from Ottoman domination. Millions 
of people are grateful to Russia for this to this day. So is 
Russia not capable of one last gesture, and should it not 
accomplish that gesture? Make one more push, a small push to 
the south, so that Russian railroads can be laid there and the 
trains can run -- Moscow to Delhi, Moscow to Kabul, Moscow to 
the Indian Ocean, Moscow to Tehran, Moscow to Baghdad, Moscow to 
Ankara -- run day and night, carrying freight and people there 
and back, and all in safe conditions. All for the economy, for 
the development of culture. 
  We must exclude the possibility of the outbreak of war in 
this region, exclude the threat of destruction of the region's 
peoples, bring them freedom and reliable conditions for 
development. The Germans want this, they will agree. Today, 
they themselves do not know what to do with 4 million Turks. 
And many Gypsies, Romanians, Czechs, and Russians have recently 
been added to that. What are they to do with that number of 
foreigners? The Germans are returning from Russia to Germany. 
We are creating a crisis for Germany, fascist parties are 
springing up there again. And we in Russia are responsible for 
this too. If we make this "southern dash," we will stop the 
exodus of Russian Germans to Germany and we will promote the 
Turks' return home from Germany. We are prepared to accept 
Turkish workers in our country too, some are already working in 
Moscow and other regions. So all our actions with regard to the 
south are well thought out; they have a geopolitical, national, 
and ideological justification. 
  This could be assessed as a discovery by political science 
with the aim of establishing new conditions in our region and 
exerting a subsequent favorable influence on the entire world 
order. All the world's capitals will understand us. I have 
spoken about this with Americans, French, Germans, Japanese, 
Greeks, Serbs -- with many people. The Finns, again -- Vyborg 
could be theirs, it will be Viipuri again. They may have 
certain priorities in Karelia. So there is reassurance for 
northern Europe. Germany will gain the opportunity to 
reestablish East Prussia on the basis of the territory of Poland 
-- part of it. And maybe take part of Moravia from the Czech 
Republic. And the Germans will be reassured and will never move 
eastward again. And if we stop the flow of our Germans to 
Germany, and are even able, on the contrary, to take from them 
some of their unemployed population who cannot find an 
occupation -- doctors, architects, engineers. In Germany there 
is a shortage of manual workers, but an excess of specialists. 
They could be summoned here, to Russia, to the regions of 
Central Asia, for joint exploitation of resources -- space, oil, 
industrial construction, farming. We would take back our 
Germans -- there are 2 million of them -- and take an additional 
3 million or so. It would be advantageous to France too. We 
would help it to rid itself of the American and Zionist 
influence. Otherwise, by the next century, by the year 2000, 
the capital of France will have turned into an Arab city. 
Because the Algerians are surreptitiously taking over Paris and 
going beyond that. Europe needs our help. 
  A great historical mission has fallen to Russia. It may be 
its last. After that, it must go over to the resolution of 
purely national tasks, the development of infrastructures, the 
construction of good roads, storage facilities, cold stores, 
transport arteries, communications networks, and new housing 
construction. Russia will in part become a single-story country 
again -- with cottages, saunas, garages, country estates, 
gardens. These are better conditions for existence than these 
stone jungles and concrete blocks. It will be a good thing for 
India, because the conflict with Pakistan will end. Russia will 
acquire a border with India. The conflicts will cease between 
Mongolia and China, China and Southeast Asia, China and India. 
Japan will finally define its position in terms of its own 
national interests. There will be reassurance for everyone. 
South Africa will have guarantees of the existence of a White 
republic in southern Africa. 
  But nobody will help Russia itself. Even America may turn 
out to need Russia's help. The expansion of Spanish speakers 
from Mexico and other Latin countries in the north [as 
published] of the United States and the multiplication of the 
black population, which could reach 40-50 million; together, 
this already totals around 100 million. Half of America will be 
colored. And in the longer term, bearing in mind that the 
colored population increases more rapidly, there will be a 
further growth of crime in America, the destruction of the white 
population and the simultaneous multiplication of the colored 
population. And who knows whether America will not ask for a 
helping hand from Russia in the mid-21st century? But Russia 
must quickly become a healthy, strong, powerful state, which 
must have ocean expanses on its borders. The Pacific Ocean is 
not warm, but it washes Russia's Far Eastern borders. Then 
there is the longest border in the world -- with China. That 
border should be calm once and for all, because China is 
oriented toward the south, not the north. Friendly India. And 
finally, the Indian Ocean. And friendly Iraq. And in the West 
-- those countries that will gain advantages. Romania might get 
something -- say, a little piece of Moldavia. Hungary could 
have a little bit of Romania, and something in Transcarpathia. 
The Poles seem to be losers, because they would like to have 
Lvov, but the West Ukrainian Republic needs Lvov. And the 
Germans will crowd out the Poles. Maybe there will be something 
to suit Poland in the region of Volyn and Brest. 
  We could resolve all these questions for our western and 
eastern neighbors, and the southeastern neighbors, but only on 
one condition -- first Russia gets what it needs; the same with 
trade -- first the goods come to Russia, and then we make 
concessions to our neighbors. And only after checking the 
quality and quantity of the goods. And prepayment. For Russia 
to concede something, and for Russia then to be let down -- we 
will not accept that. The "Democratic Russians" accepted that. 
Gorbachev and Yeltsin made all kinds of concessions to the 
West, the United States, the CIA, Israel. And what did they get 
in exchange? Nothing. Nothing, they were let down. Neither 
the Stavropol bear nor the Ural bear knows how to make a deal. 
A different kind of intellect is needed here. "A different 
kind of thinking is needed here" -- Gorbachev was right there. 
Only not the thinking of a kolkhoz member's son, the grandson 
of a Stavropol kolkhoz chairman. What is needed here is a man 
who thinks on a cosmic scale, at the very least a planetary 
scale. Then a result could be achieved which will lead to a 
reasonable kind of existence and the implementation of a 
geopolitical formula to ensure the interests of the majority on 
the planet. 
  And this is the formula we have spoken of in the pages of 
our 
book -- it is crucial to the success of world politics at the 
end of the 20th century. And we will enter the 21st century 
with new principles, new views of world politics, of the policy 
of regional cooperation. We will cease to make mutual 
accusations, we will cease to demand compensation for debts, we 
must promote harmonious relations; as in nature. We do not want 
a burning sun, but it is hard for us to be constantly amid 
gloomy weather. We do not want torrential rain -- a light 
summer drizzle is enough; we do not want snowstorms and 
hurricanes -- a light snow, fluffy and rapidly melting, is 
enough. 
  Fewer political disasters. Rule out war. Let there be 
conflicts between neighbors -- over whose goat or hog escaped 
into someone else's kitchen garden and ate up their swedes. But 
no ransom demands for the bodies of hostages seized during 
clashes. An end must be put to that situation forever. Just as 
Russia once put an end to the plague, cholera, and tuberculosis. 
But recently these diseases have reappeared in some places. 
Because we failed to maintain the correct regime -- a hygienic 
regime, medical controls, correct nutrition for the population. 
We have let our house fall into disorder, and diseases have 
begun to appear. It is the same in politics. Minimal conflicts 
are possible -- maybe over the route of ships in the warm 
Mediterranean Sea. Maybe some fishermen will accidentally stray 
into someone's territorial waters. These disputes are possible, 
but they will be resolved by arbitration. The main thing is 
that the guns must be silent. Lethal shells must not rain down 
on our citizens' heads from above. 
  It is sometimes reported in dispatches that women, old men, 
and children have been killed -- as if this is an aggravating 
circumstance. But is the death of young men a normal 
phenomenon? The flower of the nation is dying. Nobody should 
die. Numbers have nothing to do with it. If a plane is shot 
down and only the pilot dies -- it is just as much a tragedy as 
if 50, 100, or 200 people had died. Everyone's life should be 
precious. If 1 billion, 100 million people live in China and 50 
million die, there will still be a great many Chinese. Whereas 
if 6 million die in the Czech Republic, there will be no Czech 
Republic left. This approach is unacceptable. You cannot 
divide people and nations into great and not great. We must 
move toward a civil society. We are all citizens of our planet. 
We are all citizens of earth. We are Europeans, Asians, 
Africans, Americans -- we are Russians. We must live and act 
under the shelter of the law. Only this can save us. But we 
must take a final, decisive step. We must establish new borders 
and finally share out spheres of influence, so that we have no 
clashes of interstate interests. And that would not lead to 
wars. We must end all wars at the end of the 20th century and 
enter the third millenium with only minor private conflicts 
between individual citizens. And the decisive factor is: In no 
circumstances must a person's nationality be used as a 
discriminating factor. 
  So, a civil society. So, planetary thinking. The 
safeguarding of rights for each and every one. Freedom in 
everything and for everyone. But limited by a law that operates 
in time and space throughout our planet, which could be a 
blossoming and fragrant planet, but could also become a scorched 
desert with charred remnants of trees and houses. It all 
depends on us alone. 
  Moscow and Washington must realize that you cannot wait any 
longer, you cannot experiment, you cannot dismember Russia, 
because that means the ruin of Europe and of mankind. We must 
put an end to interference in the internal affairs of other 
peoples and countries, and share out spheres of influence for 
the last time. Let Russia successfully accomplish its 
last "dash" to the south. I see Russian soldiers gathering for 
this last southern campaign. I see Russian commanding officers 
in the headquarters of Russian divisions and armies, sketching 
the lines of march of troop formations and the end points of 
their marches. I see planes at airbases in the southern 
districts of Russia. I see submarines surfacing off the shores 
of the Indian Ocean and landing craft approaching the shores, 
where soldiers of the Russian Army are already marching, 
infantry combat vehicles are advancing, and vast numbers of 
tanks are on the move. Russia is at last accomplishing its 
final military campaign. War is excluded forever from the south 
for Russia, and in the north it has long been impossible. People 
in the West will understand that. And people in the East will 
understand it too. 

